<BODY DOCID=425>
The volume of contracts traded on the
New Zealand Futures Exchange (NZFE) reached a record 25,559
contracts in February, the International Commodities Clearing
House (ICCH) said.
    The previous high was 22,583 contracts in December 1986.
    The ICCH said the value of the contracts traded in February
was 2.90 billion N.Z. Dlrs.
    The seven contracts currently traded on the NZFE are:
five-year government bonds, the share price index, 90-day bank
bills, 90-day prime commercial paper, the U.S. Dollar,
crossbred wool, and wheat.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=872>
The yen should stabilize at around
152 to 153 to the U.S. Dollar for about a year, the Bank of
Tokyo's economic adviser Koei Narusawa said.
    "Both sides are showing clear interest to secure stability
of the currencies. The major target of the Japanese government
is to maintain the yen at above 150, at least for the rest of
the year," he told reporters during a brief visit to Malaysia.
    Narusawa said the U.S. Is unlikely to push the yen up
further because this might spark off inflation and depress the
U.S. Economy before the 1988 presidential election.
    The yen is trading at around 153.70 to the dollar.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=1533>
Thomas Berger, Deputy Assistant
Secretary of the Treasury, said that a further drop in the
exchange value of the dollar could cause prices to go up and
trigger inflation.
    He told a meeting of the President's Export Council that
the Japanese and the Germans have cut their profit margins to
reflect recent drops in the dollar, so prices have remained
much the same.
    But he added that if the dollar dropped further there could
be inflation in the United States.
    Berger also said that a further devalued dollar may cause
economic depressions in some U.S. trading partners, and that
would not be in America's interest because it would close those
markets to U.S. goods.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=1926>
The highly visible drama involving the
yen's sharp rise against the U.S. Dollar is obscuring the fact
that the Japanese currency has hardly budged against major
European currencies, thus creating a new set of exchange rate
distortions, Japanese and European research officials said.
    The officials, looking beneath the rhetoric of statements
by the Group of Five (G-5) industrial nations, told Reuters the
currency movements of the past two years are also creating a
fundamentally new world trade picture, which is throwing up new
trade tensions and imbalances.
    Trade figures show that the new currency alignments are
already changing the Japan-U.S. Trade axis into a Japan-
European Community (EC) axis, to the discomfort of Europe.
    In many ways, not least in terms of rare international
cooperation, the September, 1985 New York Plaza pact between
the U.S., Japan, West Germany, Britain and France to cut down
the value of the dollar was a historic one.
    But it is the underlying peaks and troughs of the major
currency movements which lay bare the real picture, in which
the Plaza pact appears as an event of prime importance, but not
necessarily central significance, the officials said.
    The officials said that when the Plaza agreement took
place, the dollar was already on its way down. The agreement
simply helped it on its way. Senior EC financial expert in
Tokyo Tomas de Hora has watched the movements closely.
    "You have to look at the dollar's peak compared with now,
and that was well before Plaza," he said.
    On February 25, 1985, the dollar peaked against the yen at
263.15 yen. On September 20, the Friday before Plaza, it was
242. Since then, despite massive Bank of Japan intervention and
periodic market frights about further G-5 concerted action, the
dollar trend has been down, down, down.
    Yet the ECU is now around 173.4 yen. The historical cross
rates for sterling and the mark tell much the same story. The
European currencies are moving back up against the yen.
    The close relationship between exchange rates and trade
flows makes it difficult to see which is driving which, but
undoubtedly the trade equation between the big three is
changing. In 1986, Japanese imports and exports with the EC
both grew by around 50 pct in dollar terms, five pct in yen.
This gave Japan a 16 billion dlr trade surplus.
    Last January, Japanese exports to the EC totalled half of
of sales to the U.S, against about a third in recent years.
    Trade with the U.S in 1986 rose 23 pct for exports and 12
pct for imports in dollar terms, but fell 13 pct for exports
and 21 pct for imports in yen terms.
    "The basic meaning for Europe is that Japanese firms have a
tremendous interest in exporting to Europe, where every unit
sold maximises profits in yen terms, which is what is important
to them. Suddenly, instead of the U.S., It is Europe that is
laying the golden egg," said de Hora.
    The EC is worried. EC business also had a remarkable year
in Japanese sales, but this can be explained partly due to its
start from a small base, compared with total Japan-U.S. Trade.
    The Japanese think EC firms are now more competitive than
U.S. Firms, a factor which is aggravating the exchange rate
imbalance, and which will cause problems.
    "This currency alignment between Japan and the EC is
reflecting the excellent performance of the EC countries. But
therefore, Japanese goods may keep their price competitive
edge," said Azusa Hayashi, Director of the First International
Economic Affairs Division of the Foreign Ministry. "If you want
my objective view, I don't expect a drastic improvement in our
trade imbalance. Last year, we asked for moderation in exports,
and this year we may have to do so again," he said.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=10081>
Federal Reserve Board governor Robert
Heller said that the dollar's current level is appropriate but
declined to comment on widespread market reports of concerted
central bank intervention this week.
    "The dollar is stable again... The current level is the
appropriate level," Heller told reporters after a speech to a
meeting of financial services analysts.
    He said last month's six-nation currency accord in Paris
did not include target ranges for the dollar in an "academic
way."
    Heller also said that it was too early to determine whether
the parties to the six-nation accord were taking appropriate
steps to carry out the longer-term economic adjustments agreed
to in Paris.
    "Clearly, they've not been implemented yet... No one
expects implementation within a week or two," he said.
    Earlier today, U.S. Treasury assistant secretary told a
Senate banking subcommittee that he did not believe that West
Germany and Japan have yet carried out their international
responsibilities.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=10308>
The 50-day provisional 1987/88 budget,
adopted today by the government, allows the Finance Ministry to
issue up to 14,600 billion yen worth of foreign exchange fund
financing bills, government sources said.
    Foreign exchange dealers said the yen funds would be used
to buy dollars, to prevent a further dollar fall.
    The government sources said the amount, covering the first
50 days of the year starting April 1, accounts for more than 90
pct of the 16,000 billion yen in bills incorporated in the full
budget.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=10357>
The Bank of Japan intervened in the
market to keep the dollar above 149 yen but the unit was under
strong selling pressure by an investment trust, dealers said.
    The central bank stepped into the market when the dollar
fell towards 149.00 yen, but a trust bank aggressively sold
dollars to hedge currency risks, and the Bank intervened again
at 149.00, they said.
    The trust bank apparently changed its earlier view that the
dollar would rise and started selling relatively large amounts
of dollars, pushing the unit down to 148.80 at one point,
brokers said.
    One dealer estimated that the Bank bought 400 mln to 500
mln dlrs as it tried to keep the U.S. Currency above 149 yen.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=10364>
The 50-day provisional 1987/88 budget,
adopted today by the government, allows the Finance Ministry to
issue up to 14,600 billion yen worth of foreign exchange fund
financing bills, government sources said.
    Foreign exchange dealers said the yen funds would be used
to buy dollars, to prevent a further dollar fall.
    The government sources said the amount, covering the first
50 days of the year starting April 1, accounts for more than 90
pct of the 16,000 billion yen in bills incorporated in the full
budget.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=10382>
The Swiss National Bank bought dollars
against yen today, a spokesman for the bank said.
    He declined to say how many dollars the bank bought or when
precisely it intervened.
    Swiss foreign exchange dealers described the National
Bank's purchases as modest, perhaps amounting to no more than
20 or 30 mln dlrs.
    The Bank of France, which was reported buying dollars
against the yen in Paris, had made inquiries with Swiss banks
as well, and the Bundesbank had also intervened. Bank of Japan
dollar purchases today were perhaps 1.2 to 1.5 billion dlrs.
    Dealers said this tended to confirm the market's impression
that major industrial countries had agreed at the Paris meeting
on an effective floor for the dollar of 148 yen, and the market
seemed ready to test it.
    Commercial clients were also selling dollars against the
yen as the end of the Japanese fiscal year on March 31 drew
closer. Today's dealings in spot currencies are booked for
March 31.
    One dealer said he had the feeling Japanese companies had
been asked by the Bank of Japan not to sell dollars at this
point, but some, while sticking to the letter of that request,
were offering dollars forward today, rather than lose out if
the dollar fell further.
    The run on the dollar against the yen came in a market
thinned by the absence of many dealers for a Forex Club meeting
in Hamburg.
    Trading was, in fact, rather light against currencies other
than the yen, the dollar holding little changed through the
day.
    The market now expected the U.S. Federal Reserve to
intervene in support of the dollar. "But they will probably do
it only half-heartedly, so I don't think it will matter too
much on rates," one dealer said.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=10475>
U.S. dealers said the New York Federal
Reserve Bank has intervened in the foreign exchange market
today buying dollars against yen.
    Fed officials do not comment on such intervention, but
dealers said it appeared that the Fed had intervened when the
dollar reached 147.50 yen in New York.
    The dollar subsequently hovered at 147.55/65 yen.
    Dealers said they were uncertain about the size of the
intervention, but some said it was only for a small amount.
They were also uncertain whether the Fed intervened on its own
account, or if it executed orders for the Bank of Japan.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=10617>
A leading U.S. Banker said the dollar
was likely to fall another five to 10 pct this year and an
improvement in the huge American trade deficit would be only
temporary at current world exchange rate levels.
    Kurt Viermetz, Worldwide Treasurer of &lt;Morgan Guaranty
Trust Co>, told Arab currency traders meeting here that the
steady depreciation of the dollar had not gone far enough to
rein in U.S. Deficits on a lasting basis.
    Speaking at the 14th annual congress of the Interarab
Cambist Association, Viermetz said an agreement reached last
month among major industrial nations to steady the dollar
around current levels left many questions unanswered.
    "I cannot see any chance for a real turnaround (rise) in the
dollar," Viermetz said. "I believe there is room for a further
fall of five to 10 per cent in 1987."
    The United States, West Germany, Japan, France, Great
Britain and Canada -- G-6 -- agreed in Paris in late February
to stabilise major currencies around current levels.
    The accord came after months of transatlantic argument,
with Tokyo and Bonn claiming Washington's policy of talking the
dollar lower had made life impossible for West German and
Japanese exporters.
    The Paris accord also brought a pause to the continued
slide of the dollar engineered by a meeting in New York in
September 1985 when industrial nations agreed to depress the
value of the currency to help redress global trade imbalances.
    But Viermetz said Morgan Guaranty's economic models showed
that with no further change in exchange rates -- and continued
sluggish growth in West Germany and Japan -- the U.S. Trade
deficit would improve only temporarily.
    He said the deficit might fall to 145 billion dlrs this
year from 165 billion in 1986 and further improve to 120
billion in 1988 but by 1990, it would be back around 160
billion dlrs.
    "This is clearly unacceptable for the monetary authorities
and politicians in Washington," he said.
    Viermetz said it was only natural that markets should
attempt to test the credibility of the Paris accord, struck
when the dollar was trading at about 1.83 marks and 152.50 yen.
    Immediately before the historic 1985 New York agreement or
"Plaza Accord," the dollar had been trading at 2.84 marks and 240
yen.
    Viermetz said he believed major nations in Paris wanted to
see the dollar hold within a "loose range" of 1.75 to 1.90 marks
and 145 to 155 yen, with any attempt to push the U.S. Currency
lower being countered by central bank intervention.
    The dollar ended in New York yesterday at 147.15/25 yen --
its lowest level against the Japanese currency in roughly 40
years. It closed at 1.8160/70 marks.
    Viermetz also said he did not see the U.S. Federal funds
rate falling below six pct for fear of provoking an
uncontrolled fall in the dollar.
    But at the same time, worries about the international debt
crisis would mean there was little chance of a rise above 6-3/4
pct since this would increase loan costs to the third world.
    The Middle East foreign exchange conference brings together
more than 200 traders and bank treasury chiefs from the Arab
world and Arab banks in European and U.S. Financial centres.
    Formal discussions, which end today, have also centred on
the role of Arab banks in world financial markets, with bankers
urging them to adapt to a new global trend towards
securitisation of  business.
    Hikmat Nashashibi, President of the Arab Bankers
Association, said Arab banks have to shake off their old
mentality of commercial banking and concentrate more on
investment banking.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=10654>
The Bank of Japan has already purchased
more than one billion dlrs in intervention since the opening
and continues to buy the U.S. Currency, dealers said.
    The central bank was supporting the dollar against the yen
amid heavy selling pressure from investment trusts and
securities houses which had pushed the dollar as low as 144.75
yen earlier this morning, they said.
    The dollar recovered slightly from the intervention and was
trading around 145.00, they added.
    It had opened in Tokyo at 145.80 yen.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=10659>
Bank of Japan governor Satoshi Sumita
said he does not expect the dollar to remain unstable and fall
further.
    He told a Lower House Budget Committee in Parliament that
the Bank of Japan would continue to cooperate closely with
other major nations to stabilize exchange rates.
    The central bank has been keeping extremely careful watch
on exchange rate movements since last week, he said.
    He said the dollar would not continue to fall because of
underlying market concern about the rapid rise of the yen.
    Sumita said the currency market has been reacting to
overseas statements and to trade tension between Japan and the
U.S. Over semiconductors.
    The yen's tendency to rise will prevent Japan from
expanding domestic demand and undertaking necessary economic
restructuring, he said.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=10660>
Finance Minister Kiichi Miyazawa said
that the dollar's drop today to 145 yen is partly attributable
to the perception inside and outside Japan that the country has
failed to fulfill its promise to expand domestic demand.
    He told a Lower House budget committee in Parliament that
it was natural for other nations to think that Japan is not
doing enough because of the delay in the passage of the 1987/88
budget.
    The budget has been delayed by opposition boycotts of
Parliament to protest government plans for a new sales tax.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=10684>
Prime Minister Yasuhiro Nakasone said
that Japan and other industrialized nations committed
themselves in Paris last month to stabilize the dollar above
150 yen.
    He told a Lower House Budget Committee in Parliament that
the six nations have taken measures, including market
intervention, to support the dollar above that level.
    Finance Minister Kiichi Miyazawa told the same committee
that the six - Britain, Canada, France, Japan, the U.S. And
West Germany - had intervened aggressively since the dollar
fell below 150 yen.
    Miyazawa said major nations are trying hard to stabilize
exchange rates.
    Asked if there had been any change in the fundamentals of
each nation since the February 22 Paris accord, he said he did
not think the fundamentals themselves had changed
substantially.
    But he said the market is sensitively looking at what is
happening in major nations. He did not elaborate.
    Miyazawa added that it was difficult to say why there has
been such speculative dollar selling in the market.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=10689>
Japan is becoming dangerously isolated
again as the U.S. And Europe feel they have been cheated by
Japanese promises to switch from export to domestic-led growth,
officials and businessmen from around the world said.
    As the dollar today slipped to a record low below 145 yen,
making Japanese exporters and holders of dollar investments
grit their teeth harder, Finance Minister Kiichi Miyazawa said
there was a perception Japan had reneged on its promise.
    The problem goes deep and centres on misunderstandings by
both sides over the key Maekawa report of April, last year.
    The document was prepared by a private committee formed by
Prime Minister Yasuhiro Nakasone and led by former Bank of
Japan head Haruo Maekawa. It recommended that to stop friction
due to its large trade surpluses, Japan must "make a historical
transformation in its traditional policies on economic
management and the nation's lifestyle. There can be no further
development for Japan without this transformation."
    Americans and Europeans took the report to heart and have
looked in vain for clear signs of this historic change. But the
Japanese remain doubtful about the short, or even medium term
prospects of totally transforming their economic habits.
    The bubble of frustration against what appears as Japanese
prevarication burst last week. The U.S. Said it intended to
raise tariffs of as much as 300 mln dlrs on Japanese exports to
the U.S. On the grounds Japan had abrogated a bilateral
semiconductor pact.
    British Prime Minister Margaret Thatcher threatened to
block Japanese financial firms from London after the Japanese
placed what the British say are restrictive conditions on a bid
by British firm Cable and Wireless to join a domestic
telecommunications joint venture.
    On Friday, European currency dealers said European central
banks, annoyed at restrictive Japanese trade practises, might
leave Japan alone to intervene to staunch the rise of the yen.
    Eishiro Saito, head of top Japanese business group
Keidanren, spotted the dangers inherent in such contradictory
views last November when he visited the European Community.
"Related to this matter of (trade) imbalance, the point that I
found to be of great cause for alarm during this trip to Europe
was the excessive degree of hope placed by the Europeans in the
results of the Maekawa report," he said.
    "We explained that the process of restructuring the economy
away from its dependence on exports toward a balance between
domestic and external demand...Would take time," Saito said.
    Saito's words were ignored. In February, EC Industrial
Policy Director Heinrich von Moltke came to Japan and said "I
only know that your government, under the leadership of
Maekawa, points to restructuring your economy into a less
outward looking, more inward looking one. It is the Maekawa
report which has attracted the most attention in Europe."
    And Europeans and Americans want quick action. "A far better
answer than protectionism would be structural change within the
Japanese economy, the kind suggested by the Maekawa report. And
we hope to see changes occur in the near future," visiting
Chairman of General Motors Roger Smith said in March.
    Such expectations are now ingrained, which was partly the
fault of Nakasone, who heralded Maekawa's report as a sea of
change in Japanese affairs, said U.S. Officials.
    Months before the report was issued, U.S. And EC business
leaders met their Japanese colleagues to discuss the trade
problem.
    "We are more anxious than ever that the new approach of the
Maekawa committee does lead to speedy and effective action,"
said EC Industrial Union leader Lord Ray Pennock.
    "The important implication of the Maekawa report is that it
is finally looking to let Japanese enjoy the fruits of their
labour," said Philip Caldwell, Senior Managing Director of
Shearson Lehman Brothers.
    Contents of the report were leaded well ahead of issuance.
    Japanese officials say they are implementing the report as
fast as they can, said a European ambassador who has travelled
the country asking about this issue.
    He said People mentioned many things in line with the
spirit of the report, including restructuring of the coal and
steel industries.
    A major misunderstanding is that the private report was
government policy. Europeans are confused about this,
underlined by von Moltke's reference to the "leadership" of the
Maekawa report. Even so, Japanese officials point to last
September's government programme of new economic measures.
"Without endorsing the report as policy, officials point out
that the government has put its signature to a programme
designed to implement the report," the ambassador said.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=10696>
Remarks by Japan's Prime Minister
Yasuhiro Nakasone that last month's G-6 meeting agreed to
stabilize the dollar above 150 yen have come too late to
influence currency trading, dealers said.
    After Nakasone's statement the dollar rose to 146.40/50 yen
from an initial low of 144.20/40 and New York's Friday finish
of 147.15/25. But the rebound was largely on short-covering,
they said.
    "I think (Nakasone's) desperate," said a U.S. Bank foreign
exchange manager.
    Nakasone told a Lower House Budget Committee in Parliament
that Japan and other industrialized nations committed
themselves in Paris last month to stabilize the dollar above
150 yen.
    Finance Minister Kiichi Miyazawa told the same committee
that the six - Britain, Canada, France, Japan, the U.S. And
West Germany - had intervened aggressively since the dollar
fell below 150 yen.
    "His (Nakasone) remarks should have been made and should
have had a bigger influence when the dollar was still above 150
yen," said P.S. Tam of Morgan Guaranty Trust.
    Tam said the dollar has hit short-term chart targets  and
is likely to rebound. But he warned of another dip to below 145
yen.
    Dealers said the worsening trade relations between the U.S.
And Japan will continue to depress the dollar.
    The trade issue has now become a political issue since the
Reagan Administration is facing uproar in Congress over
th3pYgks in cutting the country's 169.8 billion dlr trade
deficit, they said.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=10736>
Japanese Finance Minister Kiichi Miyazawa
expects the dollar to rebound soon, a Ministry spokesman said.
    He quoted Miyazawa as telling Japanese reporters that major
industrial nations are aggressively intervening in currency
markets worldwide to prevent a dollar free-fall.
    The minister believes that market forces will push the
dollar back up from its record low of 144.70 yen today,
according to the spokesman.
    Miyazawa told the Japanese reporters the U.S. Unit fell
because Japanese investors sold dollars to hedge currency risks
before the close of the 1986/87 fiscal year on March 31.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=10751>
The Bundesbank did not intervene as
the dollar was fixed lower at 1.8063 marks after 1.8231 on
Friday, dealers said.
    Business calmed down after a hectic start, with European
operators sidelined because of uncertainty about the short-term
direction of the dollar, dealers said. "At the moment, all the
action is taking place in New York and Tokyo," one said.
    The U.S. Currency traded within a 145 basis point range in
Europe, touching a low of 1.7940 and a high of 1.8085 marks.
But it remained within a narrow 40 basis point span around
1.8050 marks after the first hour of European trading.
    Comments by Japanese officials and Bank of Japan dollar
support had pushed it above 145 yen and 1.80 marks after
falling as low as 144.50 and 1.7860 respectively in Tokyo.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=10762>
Prime Minister Yasuhiro Nakasone said
that Japan and other industrialized nations committed
themselves in Paris last month to stabilize the dollar above
150 yen.
    He told a Lower House Budget Committee in Parliament that
the six nations have taken measures, including market
intervention, to support the dollar above that level.
    Finance Minister Kiichi Miyazawa told the same committee
that the six - Britain, Canada, France, Japan, the U.S. And
West Germany - had intervened aggressively since the dollar
fell below 150 yen.
    Miyazawa said major nations are trying hard to stabilize
exchange rates.
    Asked if there had been any change in the fundamentals of
each nation since the February 22 Paris accord, he said he did
not think the fundamentals themselves had changed
substantially.
    But he said the market is sensitively looking at what is
happening in major nations. He did not elaborate.
    Miyazawa added that it was difficult to say why there has
been such speculative dollar selling in the market.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=10766>
Japanese Finance Minister Kiichi Miyazawa
expects the dollar to rebound soon, a Ministry spokesman said.
    He quoted Miyazawa as telling Japanese reporters that major
industrial nations are aggressively intervening in currency
markets worldwide to prevent a dollar free-fall.
    The minister believes that market forces will push the
dollar back up from its record low of 144.70 yen today,
according to the spokesman.
    Miyazawa told the Japanese reporters the U.S. Unit fell
because Japanese investors sold dollars to hedge currency risks
before the close of the 1986/87 fiscal year on March 31.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=10769>
Bank of Japan governor Satoshi Sumita
said he does not expect the dollar to remain unstable and fall
further.
    He told a Lower House Budget Committee in Parliament that
the Bank of Japan would continue to cooperate closely with
other major nations to stabilize exchange rates.
    The central bank has been keeping extremely careful watch
on exchange rate movements since last week, he said.
    He said the dollar would not continue to fall because of
underlying market concern about the rapid rise of the yen.
    Sumita said the currency market has been reacting to
overseas statements and to trade tension between Japan and the
U.S. over semiconductors.
    The yen's tendency to rise will prevent Japan from
expanding domestic demand and undertaking necessary economic
restructuring, he said.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=10770>
Finance Minister Kiichi Miyazawa said
that the dollar's drop today to 145 yen is partly attributable
to the perception inside and outside Japan that the country has
failed to fulfill its promise to expand domestic demand.
    He told a Lower House budget committee in Parliament that
it was natural for other nations to think that Japan is not
doing enough because of the delay in the passage of the 1987/88
budget.
    The budget has been delayed by opposition boycotts of
Parliament to protest government plans for a new sales tax.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=10782>
A leading U.S. Banker said the dollar
was likely to fall another five to 10 pct this year and an
improvement in the huge American trade deficit would be only
temporary at current world exchange rate levels.
    Kurt Viermetz, worldwide treasurer of Morgan Guaranty Trust
Co, told Arab currency traders meeting here that the steady
depreciation of the dollar had not gone far enough to rein in
U.S. deficits on a lasting basis.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=11120>
Brazilian President Jose Sarney
announced a move which temporarily legalises the purchase of
U.S. dollars in the parallel currency market, aimed at
promoting imports of foreign goods.
    In a speech, Sarney justified his measure as a need to face
"current well known difficulties to obtain foreign loans for the
purchase of goods."
    The parallel market, although officially tolerated, is
technically illegal in Brazil. For the past year, the dollar in
the parallel market has sold at between 25 and 100 pct above
the official rate.
    Sarney's decision means Brazilian importers of machinery
and industrial equipment can buy dollar currency in the
parallel market without having to wait for an official order
from the Banco do Brasil's Foreign Trade Department (Cacex).
    Sarney also announced measures to boost exports in an
effort to strengthen the country's trade balance and alleviate
the risk of a reduction of foreign loans for this sector of the
economy.
    The president authorised the National Foreign Trade Council
(CONEX) to resume operating as the ruling body of Brazil's
trade policy, with participation of the private sector.
    The Council had been closed three years ago by the military
government of former President Joao Figueiredo.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=11135>
Brazilian President Jose Sarney
announced a move which temporarily legalises the purchase of
U.S. Dollar currency in the parallel market, aimed at promoting
imports of foreign goods.
    In a speech, Sarney justified his measure as a need to face
"current well known difficulties to obtain foreign loans for the
purchase of goods."
    The parallel market, although tolerated, is technically
illegal. For the past year, the dollar in the parallel market
is being sold at 25 to 100 pct above the official rate.
    Sarney's decision means that Brazilian importers of
machinery and industrial equipment can buy dollar currency in
the parallel market without having to wait for the issuing of
an official order from the Banco do Brasil's Foreign Trade
Department (Cacex).
    Sarney also announced measures to boost exports in an
effort to strengthen the country's trade balance and alleviate
the risk of a reduction of foreign loans for this sector of the
economy.
    The president authorised the National Foreign Trade Council
(CONEX) to resume operating as the ruling body of Brazil's
trade policy, with participation of the private sector.
    The Council had been closed three years ago by the military
government of former President Joao Figueiredo.
    Tomorrow, Brazil was due to fulfill payment of 15 billion
dollars in short range credit lines, but its economic officials
have suggested a 60-day extension in the deadline in order to
seek a renegotiation with its creditors.
    Sarney told members of the Council that for Brazil it is a
must to recover its annual trade balance surplus to the 12
billion dollars average recorded in 1984 and 1985, and which
dropped sharply last year to 8 billion dollars.
    He attributed the poor performance of Brazil's trade
balance in 1986 to protectionist moves by industrialised
countries, the fall in the prices of basic goods and the crisis
faced by several of Brazil's Third World trade partners.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=11163>
Finance Minister Kiichi Miyazawa said he
regards a U.S. Dollar below 150 yen as counter to the agreement
struck by major nations in Paris last month.
    He told the Upper House Budget Committee in Parliament that
Japan intervened in the market when the dollar went below 150
yen, as it considered the dollar's fall below that level
counter to the spirit of the Paris accord.
    Commenting on current foreign exchange movements, Miyazawa
said Japan would watch developments for another couple of days.
    Institutional investors appeared to have sold dollars to
hedge currency risks ahead of the end of the financial year
today, Miyazawa said.
    Behind the recent dollar fall lies the market perception
that major nations were not doing enough to implement their
policies under the Paris pact, he said, noting that passage of
Japan's 1987/88 budget has been delayed.
    He said that now was the time for major nations to act
under the Paris accord. The U.S., West Germany, France,
Switzerland and Britain have intervened on their own account to
prop up the dollar, he said. This was a concerted action.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=11212>
The Bundesbank declined to comment on
rumours in Tokyo that it was intervening heavily to support the
dollar, but dealers here said they had not seen the German
central bank in the market all morning.
    The dollar was quoted at around 1.8040 marks shortly after
midday in nervous but quiet trading, up from its 1.7975/85
opening.
    Spreads against the mark remained around 10 basis points,
with some banks quoting only five point spreads. Dealers said
spreads would widen and the dollar would move more sharply if
the Bundesbank did intervene.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=11254>
The U.S. Is willing to drop tariffs on
Japanese electronic imports if Japan shows it will abide by an
agreemement opening its markets to American goods, U.S. Trade
Representative Clayton Yeutter said in a TV interview.
    "But there has to be a clear indication that they are
willing to act," he said.
    Yeutter said difficulties in the Japanese economy caused by
the U.S. Tariffs and the yen's rise against the dollar are
problems "they have brought on themselves."
    The dollar fell to 40-year lows against the yen today.
    "Certainly the movement of the yen is causing some economic
turmoil in Japan," he said. "My only response is that we have
gone through about five years with the dollar going in just the
opposite direction. Although I can sympathise, it's occurred
for only a few weeks or months in Japan."
    The tarriffs, announced on Friday by President Reagan, will
affect about 300 million dlrs worth of products, only a tiny
fraction of Japan's total exports to the U.S.
    Even so, Reagan's decision "doesn't give us any joy. We
don't want to take retaliatory action here if we don't have to,"
Yeutter said.
    Yeutter said the meetings scheduled next month in
Washington between Reagan and Prime Minister Yasuhiro Nakasone
will include "some difficult items on the agenda."
    Japan has failed to implement two parts of a three-part
semiconductor agreement, Yeutter said.
    Japan has stopped dumping chips in the U.S. But it has
failed to open its domestic markets to U.S.-made chips and has
failed to end predatory pricing in Third World countries,
undercutting U.S. Products, he said.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=11774>
The Bank of Japan intervened in the market
in the early afternoon, buying dollars around 147.30 yen and
continuing to buy them as high as 147.50 yen, dealers said.
    The Bank intervened just after the dollar started rising on
buying by securities houses at around 147.05 yen, and hoped to
accelerate the dollar's advance, they said.
    The dollar rose as high as 147.50 yen.
  REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=11783>
Bank of Japan Governor Satoshi Sumita said
the present foreign exchange market instability will not last
long as there is caution in the market regarding the rapid
decline of the U.S. Unit.
    He told reporters the major currency nations are determined
to continue their concerted intervention whenever necessary to
stave off speculative dollar selling in line with their
February 22 currency stability agreement in Paris.
    Sumita also said he did not see the recent dollar drop as
anything like a free-fall.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=11844>
Bank of Japan Governor Satoshi Sumita said
the present foreign exchange market instability will not last
long as there is caution in the market regarding the rapid
decline of the U.S. Unit.
    He told reporters the major currency nations are determined
to continue their concerted intervention whenever necessary to
stave off speculative dollar selling in line with their
February 22 currency stability agreement in Paris.
    Sumita also said he did not see the recent dollar drop as
anything like a free-fall.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=11944>
The Turkish Central Bank set a
lira/dollar rate for April 2 of 780.00/783.90 to the dollar,
down from the previous 777.00/780.89. The Bank also set a
lira/mark rate of 429.15/431.30 to the mark, up from the
previous 430.50/432.65.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=11972>
The Bank of Finland said it has revised
the weightings in its currency basket with effect from today.
Weightings  match the respective country's share in Finland's
foreign trade.
    Weights in percentages compared with former weights.
    Dollar  9.0 (8.8)
    Sterling 14.3 (13.8)
    Swedish crown 20.4 (20.6)
    Norwegian crown 5.2 (5.2)
    Danish crown 5.2 (5.3)
    German mark 19.3 (19.6)
REUTER^M
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=12136>
The dollar's recent decline, despite
massive central bank purchases, is a forceful reminder that
official intervention in the foreign exchanges can work only if
it is well-timed to coincide with shifts in market fundamentals
or sentiment, dealers and analysts said.
    Central banks may succeed in slowing a trend, but, without
accompanying policy changes, they stand little chance of
reversing the direction of an ever-growing global market in
which more than 200 billion dlrs is traded every day, the
sources said.
    "Timing and psychology are the key to successful
intervention," said Jim O'Neill, a financial markets economist
with Marine Midland Banks Inc. The importance of complementary
changes in economic fundamentals was underlined yesterday when
a change in interest rates boosted the dollar, instantly
achieving what the central banks had tried in vain to do for a
week through open market intervention.
    After Citibank raised its prime rate by a quarter-point to
7-3/4 pct, the first change in the rate since last August, the
dollar started to advance and reached a high in Tokyo of 147.50
yen, up two yen from Tuesday's New York low.
    By contrast, monetary authorities spearheaded by the Bank
of Japan are estimated to have bought as much as 10 billion
dlrs in the last 10 days of March but could not prevent the
dollar from skidding through 150 yen and plumbing a 40-year low
Monday of 144.70 yen. Some experts worry the central banks have
lost more than just a temporary battle to prop up the dollar.
The market is wary of being caught wrong-footed by a central
bank foray, but is no longer mesmerized.
    "They've lost their credibility. The market feels it can
take on the central banks and win," said Michael Snow, head of
treasury operations at Union Bank of Switzerland in New York.
    The relative failure of recent intervention stands in sharp
contrast to the success that central banks scored when they
joined forces to drive the dollar down following the September
22, 1985, Plaza accord.
    Then, however, central banks had an easy time of it,
because the markets and the Treasuries of the major industrial
powers were agreed that the dollar needed to head lower to
redress massive worldwide trade imbalances.
    Now, there is no such consensus. The market is saying that
the dollar must fall further because the U.S. trade deficit is
showing little sign of improvement, while Japan is resisting in
a bid to protect its export industries.
    For its part, the United States is apparently content to
let the dollar fall gradually further and is paying little more
than lip service to the February Paris agreement of the Group
of Five plus Canada to foster stability, dealers say.
    Specifically, they said the Fed's dollar-buying
intervention has been half-hearted, designed more as a
political gesture to Japan than to strike fear into the
markets. "It's been pro-forma intervention," said Francoise
Soares-Kemp, chief corporate trader at Credit Lyonnais.
    Because of this discord and the market's momentum for a
lower dollar, analysts said intervention looks doomed to fail.
    "It's going to take a lot more than the central banks to
hold the dollar (at these levels)," said Snow, who predicts
another 10 to 15 pct depreciation.
    "There have to be structural changes that occur to make the
market stop selling dollars," added "Buying six billion dollars
in three weeks is not going to do it."
    Late last decade during the presidency of Jimmy Carter,
when the dollar was last under heavy speculative attack,
central banks sometimes intervened to the tune of six billion
dlrs in a single day but still failed to stop the dollar
falling to a record low of 1.70 marks, analysts said.
    Snow said purchases on that scale now are unlikely. "I
don't think anybody has the stomach for it, because they saw
the futility of it in the seventies."
    Indeed, because the market has grown in leaps and bound
since then, intervention on an even greater scale would
probably be needed to impress the market.
    Trading volume in London, New York and Tokyo alone last
year averaged nearly 188 billion dlrs a day, according to a
joint central bank study, about double the previous estimate
made just two years earlier by the Group of Thirty private
research group.
    There are signs that central banks, too, realize the
futility of swimming against the tide.
    Bank of Japan sources told Reuters in Tokyo earlier this
week that they believed the limits of currency market
intervention are perhaps being reached and that other methods
for bolstering the dollar, such as invoking currency swap
agreements with other central banks, are being considered.
    "In this era of financial liberalization, it's almost
impossible to control the flow of capital in and out of Japan,"
one senior official in Tokyo said.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=12145>
French Prime Minister Jacques Chirac
said that on financial issues, the United States and France had
"very close" views, and he said Treasury Secretary James Baker
was determined to support the February 22 Paris agreement on
stabilizing foreign exchange parities.
    "I was very reassured by the determination of Mr. Baker to
support this agreement," he said.
    He described the dollar's sharp fall against the yen at the
start of the week as a "passing incident" and added, "Everyone is
resolved to support the Paris accord."
    Questioned about his plan to help the world's poorest
countries, Chirac said he did not envisage any large-scale debt
write-offs.
    "I don't think we can talk of write-offs - even the poorest
countries have not asked for that," he said.
    Chirac said he wanted commercial banks to give third world
countries better terms in rescheduling their debts, and for the
International Monetary Fund to soften its conditions.
    "One cannot pity the banks - they bear a lot of
responsibility due to the encouragement they gave to these
countries to take on debts. Now the banks are complaining but I
do not weep for them."
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=12337>
After an already steep fall in the past
week, U.S. interest rate futures may be in for further declines
in the near term, financial analysts said.
    However, some analysts said recent sharp losses in bond
futures have left the bond market somewhat oversold, and the
contracts on long-term debt could stage a recovery before
resuming their decline.
    Key to the near-term direction of futures will be the
course of the dollar, they said.
    "As the dollar goes, so goes the bond market," said Dean
Witter analyst Karen Gibbs.
    The recent decline in the dollar, which hit a 40-year low
against the Japanese yen Monday, was reversed Wednesday when
several large U.S. money center banks unexpectedly raised their
prime lending rates by a quarter point, to 7-3/4 pct.
    "Even though the prime rate cut was good for the dollar,
foreign exchange traders are not convinced the dollar decline
is over," Gibbs said.
    The dollar decline was key in recent weakness in debt
futures as it rekindled concern about a pickup in inflation.
    Indeed, the falling dollar may have been a key topic at the
meeting of the Federal Reserve's policy making arm, the Federal
Open Market Committee, this week, analysts said.
    "To the Fed, the combination of a falling dollar, a
steepening yield curve, and rising commodity prices look
suspiciously like the traces of expectations of accelerating
inflation," said Denis Karnosky, analyst at Carroll, McEntee
and McGinley Inc.
    Such expectations could mean that "a shift in policy toward
restriction of bank reserves is likely to get very serious
consideration," at the FOMC meeting, he said.
    Any such restriction of reserves will not be a highly
visible form of monetary tightening, Karnosky said.
    Rather, the key to detecting a change will be found in
seasonal and adjustment borrowing at the discount window, he
said. Borrowings have held near a weekly average of 300 mln
dlrs over the past several months, he said.
    In the meantime, however, "the market looks a bit
oversold," said Jim Wysoglad, analyst at Golden Gate Futures.
    Wysoglad said a recovery from the oversold condition could
drive June bonds to a high near 99 before falling back to test
chart support near the recent low of 97-13/32.
    Technician Leslie Keefe of Technical Data Corp of Boston
said that the key test for June bonds will be whether the
nearby contract holds above chart support at 96-24/32.
    "All previous selloffs since mid-November have stopped and
buyers have surfaced at that level," Keefe said.
    If that level is broken, and the dollar continues to
decline, Keefe said she expects the June bond contract to
decline to test support between 92 and 93, the primary uptrend
line dating back to 1984.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=12396>
A world recession is unlikely this
year as fiscal and monetary policy in most industrialized
countries is supporting the economy, Deutsche Bank AG &lt;DBKG.F>
management board joint spokesman Alfred Herrhausen said.
    But growth rates will be smaller than last year, with 1.5
to 2.5 pct likely in most industrialized countries, he told a
news conference.
    Herrhausen said he was confident private consumption would
support economic growth in West Germany this year, with net
income increases turning into purchasing power as long as
inflation did not revive.
    Herrhausen said he did not expect interest rates to rise in
West Germany this year, but there was little room for further
falls. Rates in the U.S. were however rising, as evidenced by
the latest prime rate moves, but this rise would be moderate.
    Herrhausen said he did not expect any major narrowing of
the U.S. Trade and budget deficits in the next few months.
    One success of the Paris agreement in February to foster
currency stability was that U.S. Officials have stopped talking
down the dollar, he noted.
    The recent stability would last until markets decided to
test the resolve of central banks, he said.
    He noted that central banks had spent some 10 billion dlrs
this week to stabilize the dollar against the yen in the first
such test.
    "A massive attack on the mark, which could come if we get
bad news out of the U.S., Would require a much higher
intervention amount, raising the danger of inflation," he said.
    Turning to the international debt problem, Herrhausen said
Brazil's unilateral debt moratorium had surprised banks.
    But the move showed that a real solution to debt problems
was only possible with the involvement of all parties.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=12422>
The Finance Ministry has asked trust banks
to moderate their dollar selling, trust banking sources said.
    A Ministry official told Reuters earlier this week the
Ministry had recently surveyed foreign exchange transactions by
institutional investors, but he declined to say whether this
was aimed at moderating the dollar sales.
    Dealers said institutional investors were reluctant to sell
dollars aggressively today partly because of the Ministry
monitoring.
    One senior trust bank source said that while sympathizing
with the Ministry position, the trust banks had to conduct
their foreign exchange operations according to the dictates of
the market.
    A Bank of Japan official said the central bank approved of
the survey as long it was not used too forcefully.
    But another official denied local press reports that the
central bank itself had asked investors to moderate their
dollar sales. "We are not legally authorized to do that," he
said.
    A Bank of Japan official also said the central bank will
renew its call on financial institutions to moderate excessive
loans for the purpose of land and securities investment as such
investments threaten to cause inflation.
    Bank of Japan Governor Satoshi Sumita had previously
expressed concern about excessive investment in land and
securities resulting partly from eased credit conditions.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=12437>
The Finance Ministry has asked commercial
banks to moderate their dollar sales, JiJi News Agency
reported, quoting financial sources.
    Finance Ministry officials were unavailable for comment.
The report also could not be confirmed by several bank dealers.
    Earlier, Japanese trust banking sources said the Ministry
had asked them to moderate their dollar sales.
    A Ministry official said earlier this week the ministry had
recently surveyed currency transactions by investors, but
declined to say whether this aimed at reducing their dollar
sales.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=12470>
The Bank of Japan intervened just after
the Tokyo market opened, buying dollars at around 147.65 yen,
dealers said.
    They were unsure of the amount of the central bank's
purchasing, but it seemed to prevent the dollar from weakening
against the yen amid bearish sentiment for the U.S. Currency,
they said.
    The dollar opened at 147.65 yen against 147.20/30 in New
York and 146.90 at the close here yesterday.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=12522>
Turkey's Central Bank set a lira/dollar
rate for April 3 of 782.50/786.41 to the dollar, down from
780.00/783.90. It set a lira/D-mark rate of 428.30/430.44 to
the mark, up from 429.15/431.30.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=12780>
The Bundesbank did not intervene as
the dollar was fixed lower at 1.8162 marks after 1.8270
yesterday, dealers said.
    The dollar firmed slightly from its opening 1.8135/45 marks
in very quiet pre-weekend trading and dealers said they
expected business to remain thin this afternoon.
    "Trading is at an absolute nil, nobody wants to get involved
ahead of next week's meetings," one dealer with a U.S. Bank
said, referring to the Group of Seven industrial nations and
the International Monetary Fund meetings in Washington.
    Dealers saw the dollar staying at current levels but
possibly rising above 1.83 marks on any supporting remarks
emerging from the meetings. "But the dollar's medium-term
direction is soft," one dealer said.
    The dollar could well come under renewed pressure after the
international forums as attention returned to the U.S. And the
U.K.'s trade dispute with Japan, dealers said.
    Cross currency trading was also subdued though sterling's
rise above 1.60 dlrs helped it to firm against the mark. It was
fixed higher at 2.924 marks after yesterday's 2.910.
    The pound was seen staying between 2.90 and 2.93 marks for
the next days, dealers said.
    Eurodollar deposit rates were steady from this morning,
with six month funds unchanged at midpoint 6-11/16 pct. Six
month euromarks stayed at midpoint 3-7/8 pct.
    The Swiss franc firmed to 119.86 marks per 100 at the fix
from 119.71 yesterday and the yen rose to 1.244 marks per 100
from 1.243.
    The French franc was little changed at 30.050 marks per 100
after 30.055 yesterday.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=12795>
The Finance Ministry has asked Japanese
commercial banks to moderate their dollar sales, bank dealers
said.
    They said the Ministry had telephoned city and long-term
banks earlier this week to make the request.
    One dealer said this was the first time the Ministry had
made such a request to commercial banks.
    Finance Ministry officials were unavailable for immediate
comment. Dealers said the Ministry has already asked
institutional investors to reduce their sales of the dollar.
   REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=12877>
Turkey's Central Bank set a lira/dollar
rate for April 6 of 781.95/785.86 to the dollar, up from
782.50/786.41. It set a lira/D-mark rate of 430.15/432.30 to
the mark, down from 428.30/430.44.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=13315>
The Bank of Japan intervened in early
afternoon Tokyo trading to support the dollar against active
selling by institutional investors and speculative selling by
overseas operators, dealers said.
    The central bank had also bought dollars against the yen in
morning trade.
    The dollar traded around 145.20/30 yen when trading began
in the afternoon here and weakened only slightly, the dealers
said.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=13512>
The Bundesbank did not intervene as
the dollar was fixed lower at 1.8218 marks after 1.8243
yesterday, dealers said.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=13524>
The Bank of Japan bought a small amount of
dollars at around 145.95 yen shortly after the Tokyo market
opened, dealers said.
    But the dollar then fell on speculative selling by trading
houses, they said.
    The dollar had opened here at 145.95 yen against 145.85/90
yen in New York and 146.00 yen at the close here yesterday.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=13531>
The Bundesbank did not intervene as
the dollar was fixed lower at 1.8218 marks after 1.8243
yesterday, dealers said.
    Dealers said dollar trading was very quiet over the
European morning, with operators made wary by today's meeting
of the Group of Five finance ministers and central bank chiefs
ahead of the full IMF/World Bank session in Washington.
    It was undermined by remarks from U.S. Council of Economic
Advisers Chairman Beryl Sprinkel who told Iowa bankers the U.S.
Had no objective regarding the value of the dollar.
    Sprinkel also called the reference to stabilizing exchange
rates at about current levels, made at the Paris meeting on
February 22, a "vague statement," casting doubt on operators'
assumptions that a secret target level had been set.
    Sprinkel added that if West Germany and Japan made progress
to stimulate their economies as the Paris agreement envisaged,
"there would not be the necessity of significant declines in the
dollar."
    One dealer for a U.S.-based bank noted the dollar tended
easier after the remarks. "They were obviously regarded as being
negative. And if the market starts regarding anything that
comes out negatively then it means that the underlying
sentiment is negative," he said.
    Some early selling pressure softened the dollar's
undertone.
    Most operators overlooked intervention by the Bank of Japan
to support the dollar against selling in favour of the yen by
institutional investors and overseas operators, dealers said.
    After the strong focus on the dollar/yen rate in recent
weeks up to the end of the Japanese financial year on March 31,
interest and activity was likely to switch, dealers said.
    "We can start to look at a point in time where the interest
shifts away from dollar/yen and more into dollar/mark and the
other European currencies," the U.S. Bank dealer said.
    Despite the softer undertone, traders would remain wary of
taking significant new positions during the Washington
meetings, dealers said. Aside from the G-5 session today,
Bundesbank President Karl Otto Poehl is due to meet the German
Affairs group on international monetary issues later.
    The mark gained some strength from news the Bundesbank set
a new securities repurchase tender to add money market
liquidity at a fixed 3.80 pct, unchanged from those over the
last several weeks. Some expectation had been growing that it
might cut the rate or move to a minimum interest rate tender,
signalling a desire for a slight easing in credit policy.
    Bundesbank central bank council member Lothar Mueller said
the Bundesbank had not given up its focus on money supply. A
monetary policy which took into account exchange rates and
capital flows could not be confused with an exchange-rate
oriented policy, he said, contradicting some growing sentiment.
    Sterling eased a touch to 2.950 marks at the fixing from
2.957. The yen's unabated strength, despite the intervention,
brought it up to 1.2555 marks per 100 from yesterday's 1.2480.
    The Swiss franc rose to a fix of 120.515 marks per 100 from
120.180. The French franc eased to 30.055 marks per 100 after
30.060, Belgian franc was little changed at 4.829 marks per
100.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=13544>
The Bank of Japan intervened in early
afternoon Tokyo trading to support the dollar against active
selling by institutional investors and speculative selling by
overseas operators, dealers said.
    The central bank had also bought dollars against the yen in
morning trade.
    The dollar traded around 145.20/30 yen when trading began
in the afternoon here and weakened only slightly, the dealers
said.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=13660>
Egypt's Central Bak left the dollar rate
for Commercial banks for April 8 unchanged at 1.353/67 pounds.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=13869>
Shifts in domestic economic policy,
not a further fall in the dollar or trade restrictions, are the
key to reducing imbalances in trade and payments, Dutch Finance
Miniister H. Onno Ruding said.
    Ruding told a meeting of the World Trade Forum here that
protectionism would naturally lead to retaliation and aggravate
the problems of heavily indebted developing countries.
    "The main contribution towards resolving the still enourmous
U.S. trade deficit is not repeat not a further fall in the
dollar, is not still more protectionism in your country."
    "No, it is - like in other countries - changes in domestic
economic and financial policies," Ruding said.
    Ruding said he was less worried about a crisis of the
weakening dollar than he was in January before the Paris accord
to stabilize foreign exchange rates.
    He said the highest priority should be given to policy
changes in the United States, especially reducing the budget
deficit and encouraging domestic savings.
    But he said other countries, such as Japan and West
Germany, also needed to take greater steps toward reducing
their trade surpluses.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=13903>
Federal Reserve Board Chairman Paul
Volcker said a further large drop in the value of the dollar
could be counterproductive for world economic growth.
    Testifying before the Senate Banking Committee, Volcker
said that Europe and Japan were slowing exports and that growth
in those countries was also decreasing.
    "In that kind of situation, further sizeable depreciation
of the dollar could well be counterproductive," he said.
    Domestic expansion in foreign industrial countries has not
been enough to offset the effects of slower exports, Volcker
said.
    On the value of the dollar, Volcker said he could not say
whether it should be higher or lower to restore balance in
trade.
    "What we do know is that a substantial exchange rate
adjustment has already been made," he said.
    "That adjustment should be large enough, in a context of a
growing world economy and fiscal restraint in the United
States, to support the widespread expectations of a narrowing
in the real trade deficit in the period ahead," he said.
    Volcker said U.S. exports were now growing substantially
while import growth should slow.
    Volcker said that to improve the trade deficit with a
minimum of inflationary pressure, the United States would have
to slow its spending growth.
    It would also have to achieve a better balance between
investment and domestic savings if it wants to be able to
dispense with foreign capital.
    "The constructive way to work in the needed direction would
be to reduce our budget deficit, year by year, paving the way
for improvements in our trade accounts," he said.
    Relying on depreciation of the dollar alone would risk
renewed inflation, he said.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=13919>
The Turkish Central Bank set a
Lira/Dollar rate for April 8 of 784.50/788.42 to the Dollar,
down from the previous 784.35/788.27.
    The Bank also set a Lira/Mark rate of 430.60/432.75 to the
Mark, down from the previous 429.35/431.50.
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=13988>
Federal Reserve Board Chairman Paul
Volcker said the performance of the dollar in exchange markets
could be a factor in the U.S. central bank's decisions on
monetary policy.
    "The performance of the dollar in the exchange market might
become a factor bearing on our provision of reserves," Volcker
said in testimony to the Senate Banking Committee.
    He said that fiscal policy changes in the United States,
Germany and Japan would be more important that intervention to
instill confidence in current exchange rate levels.
                      
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=14767>
News of an agreement among G-5 and G-7
finance ministers meeting in Washington this week will be key
to the direction of currency futures at the International
Monetary Market, but any such agreement will need to go beyond
the Paris accord to stem the recent rise in futures, financial
analysts said.
    "If they (the finance ministers) give the market something
really new to look at -- that is, some package that goes beyond
the Paris agreement -- you could have a real boost in the
dollar," said Shearson Lehman Brothers analyst Anne Mills.
    On the other hand, "anything neutral would tend to be
bearish for the dollar," Mills said.
    Traders and analysts agree a simple reaffirmation of the
Paris accord will not be enough to halt the decline in the
dollar, nor will central bank intervention.
    "A lot of people are looking for a reason to buy currencies
and sell the dollar," said one trader for a large retail firm
on the floor of the IMM.
    "If there is no concrete resolution, they will be looking
to sell the dollar, possibly down to the 1.80 mark level," he
said.
    Technically, most currency futures are poised for another
rise, said Smith Barney Harris Upham analyst Craig Sloane.
    Sloane noted that June yen futures set a new contract high
on Tuesday and closed at its best level ever, while June
sterling set a new contract high on Monday.
    "Everything seems to be coming to a head right now and you
don't need much to get things rolling," Sloane said.
    In particular, the June Canadian dollar, for which Sloane
recently put out a buy recommendation, has hovered in a range
between 0.7600 and 0.7660 in recent weeks, forming a triangle
on the charts from which it may soon break out on the upside.
    A close above the contract high of 0.7665 would signal a
breakout, Sloane said, and would likely mean the nearby
Canadian dollar contract would extend its advance to near the
0.7800 level. June Canadian dollar closed at 0.7656 Tuesday.
    Mills noted, however, that interest rate differentials
between Canadian securities and U.S. securities have narrowed
dramatically recently, with yields on 10-year Canadian bonds
only about 80 basis points above U.S. 10-year notes.
    What has helped the Canadian currency, she noted, is an
increasing proportion of foreign funds flowing into the
Canadian equity market, particularly from Japanese investors.
    Other analysts, however, said currency futures may be near
the top of their long-term rally.
    "Something will be done at the (G-5 and G-7) meeting to
calm people," said David Horner of Merrill Lynch Economics.
    The Paris accord has pretty much fixed where major European
currencies will trade, Horner said.
    But sterling futures may still make another run for new
highs, up to 1.6300 to 1.6500 dlr in the June contract, on the
positive atmosphere that will prevail before British elections
and possibly another interest rate cut, Horner said. The June
British pound closed at 1.6080 on Tuesday.
    Horner said that new boundaries for the trading range of
the yen are likely to come out of the G-5 and G-7 meetings.
    The most likely range will be a bottom for the dollar
between 140 to 142 yen per dollar and a top near 150 to 152
yen, Horner said. In yen futures, the bottom of the dollar's
range would be equivalent to 0.007100 to 0.007150 in the June
contract. June yen closed at 0.006913 on Tuesday.
    If such a range does emerge from the meetings, "we will
have one more rally in the yen," Horner said.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=14770>
Bundesbank President Karl Otto Poehl
said a weaker dollar would be risky and a further appreciation
of the mark would damage prospects for sustained West German
economic growth.
    In a speech to the Institute of Contempory German Affairs
here, Poehl said "It would be an extremely risky policy to aim
for a further substantial decline in the value of the dollar to
correct the trade deficit."
    He said the United States could face a vicious circle of
depreciation, inflation and more depreciation if it took that
route.
    Poehl noted West Germany had already taken steps to meet
U.S. Demands for greater stimulation of its domestic economy,
accelerating tax cuts, cutting interest rates and tolerating
above-target money supply growth.
    He said he would have been happy to have brought forward
five billion marks of tax cuts now planned for January 1988 to
the beginning of this year, but he said the government faced
political constraints getting such measures through the upper
house of the West German parliament.
    But there were also limits to the impact West Germany could
accept on exports from a rising mark, he said.
    Poehl said West Germany relied on exports for about
one-third of its gross national product, so a substantial
erosion of export markets could not be offset by increasing
demand at home.
    "A further appreciation of the mark could even be an
obstacle to further growth," he said.
    Poehl said the Bundesbank had tolerated rapid money supply
growth last year because the country enjoyed low inflation and
because external factors, including low oil prices and
favourable terms of trade, had given some extra leeway.
    But Poehl said West Germany now faced a difficult dilemma
over monetary policy.
    The underlying rate of inflation was now two pct, not the
reported negative inflation rates last year, and West Germany
was affected more than before by exchange rate developments.
    "For the time being, we will have to focus our policy more
on the external side, and we can live with a more expansionary
money supply. But we must be very careful," he said.
    He said he shared some of the U.S. Concern about Japan's
trade surpluses, which affected European countries as well as
the United States.
    Poehl welcomed the so-called Louvre accord of monetary
officials of major industrialized countries, saying the
importance of the February 22 agreement to stabilize exchange
rates had been underestimated.
    All partners had agreed that the dollar was at about the
right level, and that further changes would damage growth, he
said.
    "This was a remarkable change in attitude, especially on the
part of our American colleagues," he said.
    But he said there was still a danger that the correction of
the dollar's value could overshoot.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=14779>
The Bank of Japan bought a small amount of
dollars shortly after the opening at around 145.30 yen, dealers
said.
    The central bank intervened as a medium-sized trading house
sold dollars, putting pressure on the U.S. Currency, they said.
    The dollar was also supported by a major electrical
consumer goods company, which was a speculative dollar buyer at
around 145.25 yen, they added.
    The dollar opened at 145.33 yen against 145.60/70 in New
York and 145.25 at the close here yesterday.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=2190>
Commerce Dept. undersecretary of
economic affairs Robert Ortner said that he believed the dollar
at  current levels was fairly priced against most European
currencies.
    In a wide ranging address sponsored by the Export-Import
Bank, Ortner, the bank's senior economist also said he believed
that the yen was undervalued and could go up by 10 or 15 pct.
    "I do not regard the dollar as undervalued at this point
against the yen," he said.
    On the other hand, Ortner said that he thought that "the yen
is still a little bit undervalued," and "could go up another 10
or 15 pct."
    In addition, Ortner, who said he was speaking personally,
said he thought that the dollar against most European
currencies was "fairly priced."
    Ortner said his analysis of the various exchange rate
values was based on such economic particulars as wage rate
differentiations.
    Ortner said there had been little impact on U.S. trade
deficit by the decline of the dollar because at the time of the
Plaza Accord, the dollar was extremely overvalued and that the
first 15 pct decline had little impact.
    He said there were indications now that the trade deficit
was beginning to level off.
    Turning to Brazil and Mexico, Ortner made it clear that it
would be almost impossible for those countries to earn enough
foreign exchange to pay the service on their debts.  He said
the best way to deal with this was to use the policies outlined
in Treasury Secretary James Baker's debt initiative.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=2354>
The highly visible drama involving the
yen's sharp rise against the U.S. Dollar is obscuring the fact
that the Japanese currency has hardly budged against major
European currencies, thus creating a new set of exchange rate
distortions, Japanese and European research officials said.
    The officials, looking beneath the rhetoric of statements
by the Group of Five (G-5) industrial nations, told Reuters the
currency movements of the past two years are also creating a
fundamentally new world trade picture, which is throwing up new
trade tensions and imbalances.
    Trade figures show that the new currency alignments are
already changing the Japan-U.S. Trade axis into a Japan-
European Community (EC) axis, to the discomfort of Europe.
    In many ways, not least in terms of rare international
cooperation, the September, 1985 New York Plaza pact between
the U.S., Japan, West Germany, Britain and France to cut down
the value of the dollar was a historic one.
    But it is the underlying peaks and troughs of the major
currency movements which lay bare the real picture, in which
the Plaza pact appears as an event of prime importance, but not
necessarily central significance, the officials said.
    The officials said that when the Plaza agreement took
place, the dollar was already on its way down. The agreement
simply helped it on its way. Senior EC financial expert in
Tokyo Tomas de Hora has watched the movements closely.
    "You have to look at the dollar's peak compared with now,
and that was well before Plaza," he said.
    On February 25, 1985, the dollar peaked against the yen at
263.15 yen. On September 20, the Friday before Plaza, it was
242. Since then, despite massive Bank of Japan intervention and
periodic market frights about further G-5 concerted action, the
dollar trend has been down, down, down.
    Yet the ECU is now around 173.4 yen. The historical cross
rates for sterling and the mark tell much the same story. The
European currencies are moving back up against the yen.
    The close relationship between exchange rates and trade
flows makes it difficult to see which is driving which, but
undoubtedly the trade equation between the big three is
changing. In 1986, Japanese imports and exports with the EC
both grew by around 50 pct in dollar terms, five pct in yen.
This gave Japan a 16 billion dlr trade surplus.
    Last January, Japanese exports to the EC totalled half of
of sales to the U.S, against about a third in recent years.
    Trade with the U.S in 1986 rose 23 pct for exports and 12
pct for imports in dollar terms, but fell 13 pct for exports
and 21 pct for imports in yen terms.
    "The basic meaning for Europe is that Japanese firms have a
tremendous interest in exporting to Europe, where every unit
sold maximises profits in yen terms, which is what is important
to them. Suddenly, instead of the U.S., It is Europe that is
laying the golden egg," said de Hora.
    The EC is worried. EC business also had a remarkable year
in Japanese sales, but this can be explained partly due to its
start from a small base, compared with total Japan-U.S. Trade.
    The Japanese think EC firms are now more competitive than
U.S. Firms, a factor which is aggravating the exchange rate
imbalance, and which will cause problems.
    "This currency alignment between Japan and the EC is
reflecting the excellent performance of the EC countries. But
therefore, Japanese goods may keep their price competitive
edge," said Azusa Hayashi, Director of the First International
Economic Affairs Division of the Foreign Ministry. "If you want
my objective view, I don't expect a drastic improvement in our
trade imbalance. Last year, we asked for moderation in exports,
and this year we may have to do so again," he said.
 REUTER...
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=2452>
The U.S. Treasury repeated a White
House statement that only President Reagan and Treasury
Secretary James Baker are authorized to speak on the dollar.
    A Department spokesman was commenting on remarks by
Commerce Department Under-Secretary Robert Ortner that the yen
was undervalued 10 or 15 pct against the dollar but European
currencies were fairly priced against the U.S. currency.
    "As Larry Speakes said on January 14 this year, only two
people in this administration are authorized to speak on the
dollar and that is the president and the secretary of the
treasury," the spokesman told Reuters.
 reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=2633>
Treasury Secretary James Baker said
there has been no change in U.S. policy on the value of the
dollar.
    Baker, when asked if the policy was changed in view of
comments yesterday by a senior Commerce Department official who
said he thought the Japanese yen was undervalued against the
dollar by 10 to 15 pct, replied, "No."
    Yesterday Robert Ortner, Undersecretary of Commerce for
Economic Affairs, said he thought the yen was undervalued but
said that was his personal view.
    This remark caused the dollar to drop as it appeared to
conflict with a recent agreement in Paris by the United States
and five other industrial nations that currency rates were at
about the right level to reflect underlying economic
conditions.
    Baker, who spoke earlier to the National Newspaper
Association, declined to elaborate on his statement about U.S.
policy.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=3019>
The 24 nations of the Organisation for
Economic Cooperation and Development (OECD), hampered by
sluggish industrial output and trade, face slower economic
growth, and their joint balance of payments will swing into
deficit in 1987, the Economist Intelligence Unit (EIU ) said.
    The EIU said in its World Trade Forecast it revised OECD
economic growth downwards to 2.5 pct this year, compared with a
2.8 pct growth forecast in December.
    It said the new areas of weakness are West Germany and the
smaller European countries it influences, and Japan, hardest
hit by currency appreciation this year.
    The independent research organisation cut its 1987 growth
rate forecasts for West Germany to 2.2 pct from 3.2 pct in
December and to 2.3 pct from three pct for Japan.
    It said it expected the OECD to post a current account
deficit of some 13 billion dlrs in both 1987 and 1988, due in
large part to a 1.50 dlrs a barrel rise in 1987 oil prices.
    It said the U.S. Current account deficit looked likely to
fall even more slowly than forecast, to 125 billion dlrs in
1987 and 115 billion in 1988 from 130 billion in 1986.
    It said it expected West Germany to post a 31 billion dlr
payments surplus and Japan a 76 billion dlr surplus this year.
    The EIU said it saw oil prices dropping to around 16.50
dlrs a barrel by end-1987 and 15.50 dlrs in 1988 from about 18
dlrs last year, as adherence to OPEC output policy becomes
increasingly ragged.
    It said the dollar is poised to resume its decline in
foreign exchange markets, and will lose a further 13 pct on its
trade-weighted index this year and five pct in 1988 after last
year's 18.4 pct drop. The average mark/dollar rate is put at
1.80 marks this year and 1.70 in 1988 while the yen/dollar rate
is expected to break through the 150 yen barrier with an
average value of 150 yen in 1987 and 146 yen in 1988, it said.
    "This is not a crash scenario but the dollar's steeper
angle of descent increases the risk of ending with a fireball
rather than a three-point landing," the EIU said.
    "Talking will not stop the dollar's slide for long and the
February meeting (of finance ministers of the Group of Five and
Canada) produced scant promise of either a decisive shift to
more expansive policies in West Germany and Japan, or a tighter
U.S. Fsical policy," it said.
    It said the key to the dollar's fortunes was the
willingness of Japanese institutions to buy U.S. Government
assets despite prospects of sustaining a currency loss.
    "Thus far they have been willing," the EIC said, adding
that if Japan was deterred from buying U.S. bonds the dollar
would collapse.
    To contain such a currency crisis, dollar interest rates
would have to soar, bringing recession and a Third World debt
crisis, it said.
    On trade, the EIU said prospects for 1987 look
"increasingly sick."
    Import growth, forecast in December at 4.5 pct, is now seen
slowing down to around 3.8 pct in 1987 with a recovery only to
4.2 pct in 1988, it said.
    The weakness of the West German economy is the biggest
single factor, with import growth there expected to feature a
sluggish 3.5 pct growth in 1987 against the 6.5 pct forecast in
December, the EIU said.
    On the export side, it said it saw weak demand in West
Germany affecting export prospects elsewhere in Europe, while
Japan's exports in 1987 would remain flat and sales by U.S.
Exporters would respond only marginally to a lower, more
competitively-priced dollar.
    It said in most of Europe and in Japan, raw materials and
oil will cost less in domestic currency in 1987 than in 1986.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=3020>
Bundesbank president Karl Otto Poehl
told a closed investment symposium that West Germany could cut
leading interest rates again if the United States makes a
similar move, banking sources said.
    The sources were reporting Poehl's remarks at a symposium
in Duesseldorf last week organised by Deutsche Bank Ag. Press
representatives were not invited.
    The sources, speaking separately, said Poehl told about 200
bankers in reply to questions that a cut in U.S. Interest rates
would give room for a matching measure in Germany.
    "It was a definite hint at lower German interest rates," said
one banker who attended the symposium.
    A Bundesbank spokesman said the central bank would have no
comment on the reported remarks, made at the private meeting.
    But, according to a second source, who also declined to be
identified, Poehl's comments were seen by bankers present as a
direct pointer to further moves by the central bank to defend
German industry from an additional revaluation of the mark.
    "He said if the Americans drop their interest rates then the
Bundesbank would also drop them. He said that quite clearly,"
the second source said.
    In reply to questions, Poehl also said the half-point cut
in the discount and Lombard rates on January 22 came after the
U.S. Had signalled it would be prepared to attend a meeting to
discuss the level of the dollar on condition Germany made such
a move in advance, the sources said.
    Asked if American authorities could have been persuaded, by
cuts in German rates, to come to the bargaining table as early
as last September, one of the sources quoted Poehl as saying,
"No, they wouldn't have been. We checked that."
    The Paris meeting of the Group of Six industrial nations
took place exactly one month after the German cut in rates.
    Poehl emphasised in his comments the very close talks
between central banks before and after the G-6 meeting, saying
that financial markets had not fully realised the significance
of the Paris session and the U.S. Agreement to stem further
falls in the value of the dollar, the sources said.
    For the first time all participants at the summit agreed
that a further fall in the dollar would be harmful for all
world economies, including the U.S., Poehl had said.
    The sources said the tone of Poehl's comments boosted
growing sentiment that the dollar would be stabilised around
current levels by international central bank cooperation.
    One source said Poehl's remarks also underlined the fact
that the Bundesbank was now more prepared to be accommodative
in monetary policy in order to prevent a further slowdown in
West Germany's economic growth.
    Poehl and other Bundesbank officials have in the past
stressed that the German central bank had no direct
responsibility for growth and was solely concerned with
combatting inflation.
    This led, for instance, to the introduction of a tighter
monetary stance from the beginning of December until the
half-point cut in rates in late January.
    The sources quoted Poehl as saying that the current
overshooting of the German monetary target would not directly
respark inflation. The Bundesbank was not obliged to react
immediately whenever such overshooting occurs.
    Latest data for central bank money stock, the Bundesbank's
main measure of money supply, showed the measure was growing at
7-1/2 pct in January, outside its three to six pct 1987 target.
    Share prices rose in very active trading today, with
dealers reporting that Poehl's remarks, coupled with a bullish
outlook on stock prices from Deutsche at the same symposium,
brought in strong bargain hunting at current low levels.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=3065>
The 24 nations of the Organisation for
Economic Cooperation and Development (OECD), hampered by
sluggish industrial output and trade, face slower economic
growth, and their joint balance of payments will swing into
deficit in 1987, the Economist Intelligence Unit (EIU ) said.
    The EIU said in its World Trade Forecast it revised OECD
economic growth downwards to 2.5 pct this year, compared with a
2.8 pct growth forecast in December.
    It said the new areas of weakness are West Germany and the
smaller European countries it influences, and Japan, hardest
hit by currency appreciation this year.
    The independent research organisation cut its 1987 growth
rate forecasts for West Germany to 2.2 pct from 3.2 pct in
December and to 2.3 pct from three pct for Japan.
    It said it expected the OECD to post a current account
deficit of some 13 billion dlrs in both 1987 and 1988, due in
large part to a 1.50 dlrs a barrel rise in 1987 oil prices.
    It said the U.S. Current account deficit looked likely to
fall even more slowly than forecast, to 125 billion dlrs in
1987 and 115 billion in 1988 from 130 billion in 1986.
    It said it expected West Germany to post a 31 billion dlr
payments surplus and Japan a 76 billion dlr surplus this year.
    The EIU said it saw oil prices dropping to around 16.50
dlrs a barrel by end-1987 and 15.50 dlrs in 1988 from about 18
dlrs last year, as adherence to OPEC output policy becomes
increasingly ragged.
    It said the dollar is poised to resume its decline in
foreign exchange markets, and will lose a further 13 pct on its
trade-weighted index this year and five pct in 1988 after last
year's 18.4 pct drop.
    The average mark/dollar rate is put at 1.80 marks this year
and 1.70 in 1988 while the yen/dollar rate is expected to break
through the 150 yen barrier with an average value of 150 yen in
1987 and 146 yen in 1988, it said.
    "This is not a crash scenario but the dollar's steeper angle
of descent increases the risk of ending with a fireball rather
than a three-point landing," the EIU said.
    "Talking will not stop the dollar's slide for long and the
February meeting (of finance ministers of the Group of Five and
Canada) produced scant promise of either a decisive shift to
more expansive policies in West Germany and Japan, or a tighter
U.S. Fiscal policy," it said.
    It said the key to the dollar's fortunes was the
willingness of Japanese institutions to buy U.S. Government
assets despite prospects of sustaining a currency loss.
    "Thus far they have been willing," the EIC said, adding that
if Japan was deterred from buying U.S. Bonds the dollar would
collapse.
    To contain such a currency crisis, dollar interest rates
would have to soar, bringing recession and a Third World debt
crisis, it said.
    On trade, the EIU said prospects for 1987 look "increasingly
sick."
    Import growth, forecast in December at 4.5 pct, is now seen
slowing down to around 3.8 pct in 1987 with a recovery only to
4.2 pct in 1988, it said.
    The weakness of the West German economy is the biggest
single factor, with import growth there expected to feature a
sluggish 3.5 pct growth in 1987 against the 6.5 pct forecast in
December, the EIU said.
    On the export side, it said it saw weak demand in West
Germany affecting export prospects elsewhere in Europe, while
Japan's exports in 1987 would remain flat and sales by U.S.
Exporters would respond only marginally to a lower, more
competitively-priced dollar.
    It said in most of Europe and in Japan, raw materials and
oil will cost less in domestic currency in 1987 than in 1986.
    However, rates of inflation will edge up in 1988 to over
the current OECD average of three pct. Non-oil commodity prices
will show a modest dollar price increase in 1988 for the first
time since 1984, the EIU said.
    After a rise of 18 pct in 1986, the dollar price of
internationally traded manufactures will go up by 8.5 pct in
1987 and by five pct in 1988, it said.
    It said OECD industrial production would rise by only 1.6
pct in 1987 after a weak 1.5 pct increase in 1986.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=3076>
The Turkish Central Bank set a
Lira/Dollar rate for March 10 of 773.05/776.92 to the Dollar,
down from the previous 769.60/773.45.
    The Bank also set a Lira/Mark rate of 417.20/419.29 to the
Mark, up from the previous 419.15/421.25.
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=3267>
USX Corp chairman David Roderick called
for a lower value for the U.S. dollar against other currencies
to help speed a correction in the U.S. trade deficit, which
last year reached 170 billion dlrs.
    In remarks prepared for a speech before the Economic Club
of Detroit, Roderick said, "There should be total resolve that
the dollar versus other major currencies, as well as the
currencies of other nations having a substantial trade surplus
with us, must continue to decline so that the correction in our
trade deficit starts on the road to recovery."
    Roderick said the U.S. should be understanding of the
"economic pain" our trading partners experience as a result of
a falling dollar.
    But, he added, "As painful as the correction may be to our
trading partners, it is less painful than leaving the problem
uncorrected because that would lead us into an inevitable,
lengthy and steep world recession."
    Roderick said between February 1985 and December 1986 the
dollar fell by more than 40 pct in real terms against major
industrial currencies and by 30 to 35 pct against a broader
group of currencies of nearly all developing nations.
    At the end of 1986, he said, the value of foreign assets in
the U.S. exceeded the value of U.S. assets abroad by 240
billion dlrs, compared to five years ago when the U.S. had a
surplus in assets of 141 billion. A company spokesman said the
data were provided by economic consultants to USX.
    The primary reason for the trade imbalance was the 70 pct
rise of the dollar between 1980 and 1985, although other
factors were involved, Roderick said. But it is wrong, he said,
"to attribute the massive trade deficit to a fundmental
deterioration of U.S. productivity or of American product
quality."
    These areas need to be improved but they are not the root
cause of the trade gap problem, Roderick said. He urged
American manufacturers to become more competitive so they can
compete in global markets.
    In the speech, the USX chairman also called for changes in
securities laws to curb what he called abuses by corporate
raiders and speculators.
    Among his proposals, which he presented to the Senate
Banking Committee in testimony last week, were a requirement
that raiders give 24-hour notice for every one pct of stock
they acquire in a company.
    Roderick proposed that tender offers must be made for all
cash to all stockholders on equal terms and that raiders be
required to have financing in place before a tender is made.
    Further, raiders should be required to make an all-cash
tender offer once they acquire 10 pct of a target company's
stock, he said. And payment of greenmail, or a preferential
price by a target company to buy back a raider's stake, should
be prohibited under the revised laws.
    Roderick said changes were necessary to curb abuses but
that he did not want laws that would hurt the financial markets
or discourage "fair price to all" takeovers.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=3338>
The dollar will decline over the next
two to three years, but this is unlikely to result in a
complete reduction of the U.S. current account deficit, said
Anthony Solomon, chairman of S.G. Warburg (USA) Inc and former
president of the Federal Reserve Bank of New York.
    In a presentation to the Japan Society, Solomon said
without elaboration that he expects a "significant decline in
the dollar," within the next three years.
    "The dollar will fall more, but the current account deficit
will stop being reduced when it reaches its structural core,"
he said.
    Solomon described the structural core as about one-half of
the current 150 billion dlr annual deficit. He cited several
factors which will prevent an elimination of the deficit.
    For one thing, it is unlikely that there will be any new
investment in those manufacturing industries that shrank when
the dollar was at uncompetitive levels, he said.
    In addition, he said that the U.S. has an increased
propensity to import in order to satisify consumer tastes.
    Solomon forecast inflation at 4.5 pct by year-end, but said
it could be kept below five pct in the medium-term if oil
prices are stable and commodity values remain low.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=3421>
U.S. authorities intervened in the
foreign exchange market to support the dollar on one occasion
during the period between the start of November 1986 and the
end of January, the Federal Reserve Bank of New York said in a
report.
    The Fed's quarterly review of foreign exchange operations
said that the U.S. bought 50 mln dlrs through the sale of yen
on January 28. This operation was coordinated with the Japanese
monetary authorities and was funded equally by the Fed and the
U.S. Treasury.
    The Fed's intervention was on the morning after president
Reagan's State of the Union message and was "in a manner
consistent with the joint statement" made by U.S. Treasury
secretary James Baker and Japanese finance minister Kiichi
Miyazawa after their January 21 consultations.
    At that meeting, the two reaffirmed their willingness to
cooperate on exchange rate issues.
    The Fed's report did not say at what level the intervention
occurred. But on January 28, the dollar closed at 151.50/60 yen
after dipping as low as 150.40 yen earlier in the session. It
had closed at 151.05/15 yen the previous day.
    The dollar had plumbed a post-World War II low of 149.98
yen on January 19 and reached a seven-year low of 1.7675 marks
on January 28. It ended that day at 1.7820/30 marks.
    The Fed noted that, after trading steadily throughout
November and the first half of December, the dollar moved
sharply lower until the end of January.
    It closed the three-month review period down more than 11
pct against the mark and most other Continental currencies and
seven pct lower against the yen and sterling. It had fallen
four pct against the Canadian dollar.
    During the final days of January, pressure on the dollar
subsided. Reports of the U.S.-Japanese intervention operation
and talk of an upcoming meeting of the major industrial
countries encouraged expectations for broader cooperation on
exchange rate and economic policy matters, the Fed said.
    Moreover, doubts had developed about the course of U.S.
interest rates. The dollar's swift fall had raised questions
about whether the Fed would let short-term rates ease.
    Thus the dollar firmed to close the period at 1.8320 marks
and 153.70 yen. According to the Fed's trade-weighted index, it
had declined nine pct since the beginning of the period.
    The dollar had risen as high as 2.08 marks and 165 yen in
early November.
    The Fed last intervened in the foreign exchange market on
November 7, 1985 when it bought a total of 102.2 mln dlrs worth
of marks and yen.
    The Fed's action followed the September 1985 Plaza
agreement between the five major industrial nations under which
they agreed to promote an orderly decline of the dollar.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=4616>
Finance Minister Kiichi Miyazawa told a
press conference he thinks exchange rates will remain stable
due to the currency accord reached in Paris last month by six
major industrialised nations but he did not say for how long.
    The dollar has hovered around 153 yen since the six agreed
to cooperate to bring about currency stability.
    Asked to comment on remarks by some U.S. Officials calling
for a further decline of the dollar, Miyazawa said only the
U.S. President and the U.S. Treasury Secretary can make
official statements about exchange rates.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=4882>
U.S. Trade Representative Clayton
Yeutter said that whether the exchange rate of the dollar would
fall or rise in the coming decade would depend on nations'
financial, monetary and tax policies.
    But, he said, in a speech and remarks to the Heritage
Foundation, that in the end "the marketplace will ultimately
rule the day."
    Asked about the future of the dollar, he said that whether
or not it would rise or fall depended on economic policies and
coooperation among trading nations.
    Yeutter said "if nations do the right kinds of things in
financial, monetary and tax policies, then a lesser burden of
adjustment is placed on exchange rates, and one could envision
a situation of the major trading nations moving back far closer
to what most of us would consider equilibrium and exchange
rates becoming relatively stable."
    But he said, on the other hand, that if nations did not
exhibit greater self discipline and international cooperation,
"It is simply inevitable that the exchange rates will make that
adjustment."
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=5290>
Leading industrial nations will meet
again next month to review their accord on currency stability,
but U.S. Officials said financial markets are convinced for now
the countries will live up to commitments to speed up economic
growth.
    The narrow currency movements of recent weeks strongly
suggests the six leading industrial countries have tamed the
normally unruly financial markets and next month's talks seem
likely to build on that stability.
    A Reagan administration official said the Paris agreement
last month was the main reason markets were calm.
    But he said in an interview that financial markets also
understood, "That all six countries concluded that the measures
to be taken over a period of time in the future should foster
stability of exchange rates around current levels. That is in
fact what has happened since Paris."
    Monetary analysts said stability has been helped in part by
the decision of industrial nations to bury the hatchet and
cease to quarrel over short-term policy objectives.
    Instead they have focused on medium-term policy goals, but
left room to adjust their agreements with periodic meetings.
    The official refused to comment, however, on whether the
agreement included a secret pact to consider further
coordinated interest rate cuts -- a measure industrial nations
have taken jointly several times in the past year.
    On February 22, the United States, Japan, West Germany,
France, Britain and Canada agreed that major currencies were
within ranges broadly reflecting underlying economic
conditions, given commitments by Washington to cut its budget
deficit and by Toyko and Bonn to boost economic growth.
    The shake-up would strengthen the U.S. Position in future
international talks.
    "I think these changes will strengthen the President's hand
politically and the stronger he is politically the better off
we are with the Congress and the better off we are in
international fora," said the official, an Administration
economic policymaker. "So it would be beneficial to the
continued conduct of our initiatives."
    But the official also said the Administration would resist
calls for a tax increase to cut the budget deficit -- a target
Europeans say is crucial to help curb economic instability.
    Currency analysts believe the Paris agreement set secret 
short-term target ranges for their currencies with a specific
agreement to defend those bands with intervention.
    According to market sources, the ranges agreed were 1.60 to
1.90 marks to the dollar, and 140 to 155 yen to the dollar.
    There is no official confirmation that specific bands  were
set, although the agreement used the term "ranges", for the first
time in an international economic agreement.
    The Paris accord stated the six would cooperate closely to
foster currency stability around current levels.
    Last week, dealers said the Federal Reserve intervened to
stop the dollar rising against the mark, which had breached
1.86 to the dollar. British authorities are also understood to
have intervened to curb sterling's strength.
    International monetary sources say finance ministers and
central bankers, who will review market performance and their
own economic prospects, will reassemble again in Washington
just before the April 9 policymaking meeting of the
International Monetary Fund.
    The sources said Italy, which refused to join the Paris
pact, was invited back by Treasury Secretary James Baker.
    Since Paris, there are signs West German growth is slowing,
while U.S. Officials said they were giving Japan until April to
show that an economic stimulus package was in the offing.
    Signs of concern about German prospects emerged recently
when Bundesbank (central bank) president Karl Otto Poehl told
bankers he would consider cutting West German interest rates if
the Fed was ready to follow suit.
    A Reagan Administration official said this would show there
had been some change in approach on the part of the central
bank in Germany.
    But he declined to comment on the prospects for action by
the Fed and the Bundesbank.
    "If there is such a provision it is private and if I talked
about it, it would no longer be private," said the official, who
asked not to be identified.
    Public comments by Fed officials suggest the central bank
is keeping credit conditions broadly unchanged, but if the
major economies continue to show sluggish growth and the U.S.
Trade deficit remains stubbornly high, further coordinated
action could be on the April agenda.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=5778>
Underlying dollar sentiment is bearish,
and operators may push the currency to a new low unless Japan
takes steps to stimulate its economy as pledged in the Paris
accord, foreign exchange analysts polled by Reuters said here.
    "The dollar is expected to try its psychological barrier of
150.00 yen and to fall even below that level," a senior dealer
at one leading bank said.
    The dollar has eased this week, but remains stable at
around 151.50 yen. Six major industrial countries agreed at a
meeting in Paris in February to foster currency stability.
    Some dealers said the dollar may decline in the long term,
but a drastic fall is unlikely because of U.S. Fears of renewed
inflation and fears of reduced Japanese purchases of U.S.
Treasury securities, needed to finance the U.S. Deficit.
    Dealers generally doubted whether any economic package
Japan could adopt soon would be effective enough to reduce its
trade surplus significantly, and said such measures would
probably invite further U.S. Steps to weaken the dollar.
    Under the Paris accord, Tokyo promised a package of
measures after the fiscal 1987 budget was passed to boost
domestic demand, increase imports and cut its trade surplus.
    But debate on the budget has been delayed by an opposition
boycott of Parliamentary business over the proposed imposition
of a five pct sales tax, and the government has only a slim
chance of producing a meaningful economic package in the near
future, the dealers said.
    If no such steps are taken, protectionist sentiment in the
U.S. Congress will grow, putting greater downward pressure on
the dollar, they said.
    The factors affecting the U.S. Currency have not changed
since before the Paris accord, they added.
    "Underlying sentiment for the dollar remains bearish due to
a still-sluggish U.S. Economic outlook, the international debt
crisis triggered by Brazil's unilateral suspension of interest
payments on its foreign debts and the reduced clout of the
Reagan administration as a result of the Iran/Contra arms
scandal," said a senior dealer at a leading trust bank.
    "There is a possibility that the dollar may decline to
around 140.00 yen by the end of this year," said Chemical Bank
Tokyo branch vice president Yukuo Takahashi.
    But operators find it hard to push the dollar either way
for fear of possible concerted central bank intervention.
    Dealers said there were widespread rumours that the U.S.
Federal Reserve telephoned some banks in New York to ask for
quotes last Wednesday, and even intervened to sell the dollar
when it rose to 1.87 marks.
    The Bank of England also apparently sold sterling in London
when it neared 1.60 dlrs on Wednesday, they said.
    But other dealers said they doubted the efficacy of central
bank intervention, saying it may stimulate the dollar's decline
because many dealers are likely to await such dollar buying
intervention as a chance to sell dollars.
    However, First National Bank of Chicago Tokyo Branch
assistant manager Hiroshi Mochizuki said "The dollar will not
show drastic movement at least to the end of March."
    Other dealers said the U.S. Seems unwilling to see any
strong dollar swing until Japanese companies close their books
for the fiscal year ending on March 31, because a weak dollar
would give Japanese institutional investors paper losses on
their foreign holdings, which could make them lose interest in
purchases of U.S. Treasury securities.
    U.S. Monetary officials may refrain from making any
comments this month to avoid influencing rates, they said.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=6108>
The dollar is near appropriate levels
against European currencies and the yen, and a further fall
could damage confidence in the currency while endangering world
economic growth, a top Bundesbank official said.
    Board member Leonhard Gleske also told a Forex Association
conference current exchange rates of major currencies "can be
viewed as equilibrium levels in a medium-term perspective."
    He said the recent Paris agreement on currency
stabilisation and policy coordination between the Group of Five
and Canada may herald "an era of greater exchange rate
stability."
    The Paris agreement was not, however, an attempt to set up
permanent target zones for exchange rates, Gleske stressed,
adding such targets would be extremely difficult to agree and
enforce on an international level.
    "At present levels the dollar can no longer be considered
grossly overvalued in relation to the European currencies and
the yen," Gleske said.
    He said the dollar had fallen much less against currencies
of important trading nations such as Canada, Korea, Taiwan and
Hong Kong, and further falls there may still be necessary.
    But "a further dollar depreciation against major European
currencies and the yen may not be the best way to restore the
dollar to a fully competitive position, as measured by its
weighted external value," he said.
   In fact, a further marked decline in the dollar rate would
hold two major dangers, Gleske said.
    First, in countries with large balance of payments
surpluses such as Japan and West Germany, it threatened to
hamper economic growth and thus slow down the expansion of real
income and domestic expenditure necessary to wipe out
surpluses.
    Second, in the United States, it could damage investors'
confidence in the dollar and thus reduce their willingness to
finance huge fiscal and external payments deficits, Gleske
said.
    Gleske also was strongly sceptical that an international
system of binding target zones for currencies, fluctuating in
narrow bands against each other, can be established. Such
targets threatened to cause policy conflicts, "both within
countries and between them."
    For instance, the U.S. Reliance on foreign capital to fund
its deficits requires interest rates there be set at high
levels, but domestic considerations call for low ones.
    If target zones were established, this would put "pressure
on other countries to reduce their interest rates even more,
even though this may be in conflict with their own domestic
situation and priorities," he said.
    Gleske added, "targeting the exchange rate even within a
wide margin will meet with serious objections where there is a
clearly perceived potential for conflict between domestic and
external policy priorities."
    Commenting on the Paris currency accord, Gleske said its
chances of stabilising exchange rates rested heavily on current
interest rate differentials being maintained.
    These chances "seem to me to rest critically on the
expectation that the current configuration of interest rates,
and the monetary policies behind them, will assure smooth
financing of current account imbalances in the months ahead."
    Gleske said past experience of currency adjustments had
learned "that markets are inclined to be impatient and will thus
tend to overshoot." He said this "would seem to be unnecessary
and should be avoided if at all possible."
    Monetary policies can help achieve this, but only if
markets believe that pledged changes in fiscal policies will
lead to balanced international payments, he said.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=8097>
U.S. Treasury Secretary James Baker
again said the meeting of six major industrial nations in Paris
last month did not establish a target exchange rate for the
dollar.
    Baker said in a television interview aired here yesterday:
"We don't have a target for the dollar." He declined to comment
on what might be a desired level for the dollar, saying: "We
really don't talk about the dollar."
    He said protectionism was becoming "extremely strong" in the
U.S. In response to widening U.S. Trade deficits and import
barriers in other countries.
    "The mood in the United States is extremely disturbing. It's
extremely strong," he said.
    "As I've said before, we sort of see ourselves as engaged
here in a real struggle to preserve the world's free trading
system, because if the largest market in the world (the U.S.)
goes protectionist we run the risk of moving down the same path
that the world did in the late 1930s," he said.
    While relative exchange rates had a role to play in
defusing the threat of protectionism, it alone did not offer
any solution, he said.
    "You must address this problem on the exchange rate side,
but it cannot be solved on the exchange rate side alone. It's
far more comprehensive and broad than that, and the solution of
it requires a comprehensive approach," Baker said in the
interview.
    Baker said it would be necessary for other countries to
adjust their currencies upwards, as well as remove their
barriers to U.S. Imports. But he did not elaborate or name any
countries.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=8189>
U.S. Treasury Secretary James Baker
again said the meeting of six major industrial nations in Paris
last month did not establish a target exchange rate for the
dollar.
    Baker said in a television interview aired here yesterday:
"We don't have a target for the dollar." He declined to comment
on what might be a desired level for the dollar, saying: "We
really don't talk about the dollar."
    He said protectionism was becoming "extremely strong" in the
U.S. In response to widening U.S. Trade deficits and import
barriers in other countries.
    "The mood in the United States is extremely disturbing. It's
extremely strong," he said.
    "As I've said before, we sort of see ourselves as engaged
here in a real struggle to preserve the world's free trading
system, because if the largest market in the world (the U.S.)
goes protectionist we run the risk of moving down the same path
that the world did in the late 1930s," he said.
    While relative exchange rates had a role to play in
defusing the threat of protectionism, it alone did not offer
any solution, he said.
    "You must address this problem on the exchange rate side,
but it cannot be solved on the exchange rate side alone. It's
far more comprehensive and broad than that, and the solution of
it requires a comprehensive approach," Baker said in the
interview.
    Baker said it would be necessary for other countries to
adjust their currencies upwards, as well as remove their
barriers to U.S. Imports. But he did not elaborate or name any
countries.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=8591>
The Bank of Japan stepped up its dollar
buying as it re-entered the market after the midday Tokyo lunch
break, dealers said.
    They said the bank seemed more determined to support the
dollar than it did this morning.
    Several dealers said the central bank intervened this
afternoon when the dollar stood around 149 yen.
    One said it purchased 150 to 200 mln dlrs in the half-hour
since the market re-opened after its lunchtime closure. Another
said the bank still has buying orders in the market.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=8621>
The dollar is expected to decline further
in coming days as scepticism mounts about the effectiveness of
last month's Paris accord to stabilise currency exchange rates,
senior foreign exchange dealers said.
    Following its fall today to a record 148.40 yen, dealers
said they expect the dollar to establish a new trading range of
147 to 150 yen before the market again tries to push it down.
Behind the latest dollar fall lies the belief that last month's
accord was no longer enough to stop operators pushing the
dollar down, the dealers said.
    "The recent remark by U.S. Treasury Secretary James Baker
that the Paris accord did not set any target ranges for major
currencies has cast a shadow on the agreement," said Koji
Kidokoro, general manager of Mitsui Bank Ltd's treasury
division.
    He said the market interpreted this as indicating the U.S.
Would favour a weaker dollar and it had little intention of
intervening to support the currency.
    "This eliminated the widespread market caution against
possible joint central bank intervention," Kidokoro said.
    Dealers said the dollar had gathered renewed downward
momentum and that Bank of Japan intervention alone could hardly
contain a further slide in the currency.
    They said the central bank bought between one to 1.5
billion dlrs today, including direct purchases through brokers,
and yesterday it might have bought a small amount of dollars
through the U.S. Central bank in New York.
    Most dealers said they doubted the U.S. Federal Reserve
would intervene on its own account to support the dollar, but
some said this might occur if the dollar fell much below 148
yen.
    "If the dollar drops to that low level, it could reduce the
flow of foreign capital into U.S. Securities, which the
Americans don't want," said Haruya Uehara, chief money market
manager of Mitsubishi Trust and Banking Corp.
    He said the dollar may return to around 152 yen next month
when corporations reduce their dollar sales after they close
their books for the 1986/87 business year ending on March 31.
    But dealers said the longer-term outlook for the dollar
remained bearish. This was due to the lacklustre performance of
the U.S. Economy, the continuing U.S. Trade deficit and
Japanese delays in announcing an economic stimulation package.
    "The Americans are getting frustrated at Japan's inertia in
stimulating its economy," said Hirozumi Tanaka, assistant
general manager of Dai-Ichi Kangyo Bank Ltd's international
treasury division.
    In the Paris currency accord Japan promised a package of
economic measures, after the fiscal 1987 budget was passed, to
boost domestic demand, increase imports, and thus reduce its
trade surplus. The package was expected in April, but debate on
the budget has been delayed by an opposition boycott of
parliamentary business over the proposed introduction of a
sales tax.
    In the circumstances the government had only a slim chance
of producing a meaningful economic package in the near future,
Dai-Ichi Kangyo's Tanaka said.
    Dealers said if steps are not taken to stimulate the
Japanese economy protectionist sentiment in the U.S. Congress
would grow and put more downward pressure on the dollar.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=8657>
The Bank of Japan stepped up its dollar
buying as it re-entered the market after the midday Tokyo lunch
break, dealers said.
    They said the bank seemed more determined to support the
dollar than it did this morning.
    Several dealers said the central bank intervened this
afternoon when the dollar stood around 149 yen.
    One said it purchased 150 to 200 mln dlrs in the half-hour
since the market re-opened after its lunchtime closure. Another
said the bank still has buying orders in the market.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=8664>
The dollar is expected to decline further
in coming days as scepticism mounts about the effectiveness of
last month's Paris accord to stabilise currency exchange rates,
senior foreign exchange dealers said.
    Following its fall today to a record 148.40 yen, dealers
said they expect the dollar to establish a new trading range of
147 to 150 yen before the market again tries to push it down.
Behind the latest dollar fall lies the belief that last month's
accord was no longer enough to stop operators pushing the
dollar down, the dealers said.
    "The recent remark by U.S. Treasury Secretary James Baker
that the Paris accord did not set any target ranges for major
currencies has cast a shadow on the agreement," said Koji
Kidokoro, general manager of Mitsui Bank Ltd's treasury
division.
    He said the market interpreted this as indicating the U.S.
Would favour a weaker dollar and it had little intention of
intervening to support the currency.
    "This eliminated the widespread market caution against
possible joint central bank intervention," Kidokoro said.
    Dealers said the dollar had gathered renewed downward
momentum and that Bank of Japan intervention alone could hardly
contain a further slide in the currency.
    They said the central bank bought between one to 1.5
billion dlrs today, including direct purchases through brokers,
and yesterday it might have bought a small amount of dollars
through the U.S. Central bank in New York.
    Most dealers said they doubted the U.S. Federal Reserve
would intervene on its own account to support the dollar, but
some said this might occur if the dollar fell much below 148
yen.
    "If the dollar drops to that low level, it could reduce the
flow of foreign capital into U.S. Securities, which the
Americans don't want," said Haruya Uehara, chief money market
manager of Mitsubishi Trust and Banking Corp.
    He said the dollar may return to around 152 yen next month
when corporations reduce their dollar sales after they close
their books for the 1986/87 business year ending on March 31.
    But dealers said the longer-term outlook for the dollar
remained bearish. This was due to the lacklustre performance of
the U.S. Economy, the continuing U.S. Trade deficit and
Japanese delays in announcing an economic stimulation package.
    "The Americans are getting frustrated at Japan's inertia in
stimulating its economy," said Hirozumi Tanaka, assistant
general manager of Dai-Ichi Kangyo Bank Ltd's international
treasury division.
    In the Paris currency accord Japan promised a package of
economic measures, after the fiscal 1987 budget was passed, to
boost domestic demand, increase imports, and thus reduce its
trade surplus. The package was expected in April, but debate on
the budget has been delayed by an opposition boycott of
parliamentary business over the proposed introduction of a
sales tax.
    In the circumstances the government had only a slim chance
of producing a meaningful economic package in the near future,
Dai-Ichi Kangyo's Tanaka said.
    Dealers said if steps are not taken to stimulate the
Japanese economy protectionist sentiment in the U.S. Congress
would grow and put more downward pressure on the dollar.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=8714>
The sharp drop in the value of the
dollar against the yen and the mark is the first serious test
of last month's Group of Five (G-5) plus Canada agreement to
stabilise currencies, dealers and bank economists said.
    "The dollar will be pushed down until there is coordinated
central bank intervention," one dealer for a German bank said,
echoing widepread sentiment in the market.
    But opinion was divided on whether the united front forged
in Paris still exists. Some dealers said there were growing
signs the United States wanted the dollar to fall further.
    Despite repeated Bank of Japan intervention, the dollar
plunged to a post-war low in Tokyo today. It was quoted as low
as 148.40 yen in the Far East and dealers here said they
expected the U.S. Currency to decline further.
    "The dollar is now firmly within a broad 140 to 150 yen
range," Chase Bank AG's senior dealer Eckhart Hager said.
    Others said there were technical reasons for the sharp
dollar drop. "Window-dressing" operations by some Japanese
companies who were selling dollars and buying yen before the
end of the Japanese fiscal year on March 31 were undermining
the U.S. Currency.
    Dealers said main reason for the sell-off was not
technical. U.S. Treasury Secretary James Baker's comment the
Paris accord did not have fixed dollar targets was seen as a
renewed attempt by the U.S. Administration to talk the dollar
down.
    "Suddenly, support levels which had existed for fear of
central bank intervention disappeared," one dealer said.
    The Bank of Japan was believed to have bought some 1.5
billion dlrs, and this with comments by Japanese officials
indicated Tokyo was unhappy about the plunge, dealers said.
Bank of Japan governor Satoshi Sumita threatened central bank
intervention if necessary.
    Japanese Finance Minister Kiichi Miyazawa said today the
time had come for the six nations who agreed in Paris last
month to stabilise currencies - Japan, Britain, Canada, France,
the U.S. And West Germany - to take action in line with the
pact.
    But the Bundesbank and other European central banks were
not detected in the open market during the European morning.
Opinion here was divided on when the Bundesbank would act.
    While some said the West German central bank would support
the dollar once it fell below 1.80 marks, others said the
Bundesbank would only intervene after a fall below 1.75 marks
or if the decline accelerated.
    The Bundesbank last intervened on January 27, when the
dollar threatened to fall below 1.81 marks.
    "The Japanese seem to be on their own at the moment," one
dealer said. Others said cooperation between central banks and
governments was easier said than done.
    Some said Baker's remarks and U.S. Trade Representative
Clayton Yeutter's warning that the U.S. And Japan were on the
verge of a serious trade conflict showed there was a rift.
    "It's hard to tell whether the G-6 agreement still stands," a
dealer said. Another added, "If the Americans do not get what
they want, they will push the dollar down, regardless of G-6."
    Citibank AG also cast doubt on the chances of success for
the Paris agreement in its latest investment letter.
    "It is hard to see that Japan and Germany are willing or
able to loosen fiscal policy sufficiently to offset the
necessary U.S. Fiscal contraction," Citibank said.
    It added, "Markets should therefore be aware that 1.80 marks
is not the lower limit for the dollar -- a rate of 1.70 marks
or even less is expected this year."
    And London Broker Hoare Govett said in its March 1987
economic report, "We are looking for a further, more gradual,
fall, possibly to 1.60 marks by the end of the year."
    But opinion about whether the Paris accord was still in
force was not universal. Some dealers said not too much should
be read into Baker's and Yeutter's comments.
    "There is no reason to believe the Paris pact has broken
down," a senior dealer said.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=8735>
The Federal Reserve appears to have
intervened in the U.S. foreign exchange market to buy dollars
against yen this morning, currency dealers said.
    They said the intervention occurred near the dollar's early
low of 148.50 yen and the U.S. currency subsequently firmed to
149.05/15. It closed at 150.00/05 on Monday.
    Dealers were uncertain of the amount involved and whether
the Fed's purchases were for its own account or for a customer.
But there was speculation that it may have been done in
conjunction with the Bank of Japan. Tokyo dealers said the
Japanese central bank bought dollars in Tokyo earlier today.

 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=9022>
Central bank intervention in the
foreign exchange markets succeeded in staunching the dollar's
losses today, but senior dealers here believe the U.S. currency
is headed for a further retreat.
    Although the intervention was widespread, dealers perceive
that the six major industrial nations have differing levels of
commitment to their recent accord to stabilize currencies.
    Moreover, hard economic realities hold greater sway over
the currency market than central bank intervention and these
argue for a further dollar decline, dealers said.
    "The market can be bigger than the central banks. And
economic fundamentals will always come to the fore," said a
dealer at one major U.S. bank.
    As the dollar dropped to post-World War II lows against the
yen today foreign exchange traders said the Bank of Japan,
Federal Reserve Board and Bank of England intervened in the
markets on behalf of the U.S. currency.
    Reports of the authorities' actions helped the dollar
recover to about 149.45 yen in New York this afternoon from
the post-war low of 148.20 yen in the Far East. But it still
failed to regain Monday's U.S. closing level of 150.00/05 yen.
    Tokyo dealers said the Bank of Japan bought one to 1.5
billion dlrs in Tokyo today and may also have purchased dollars
yesterday in the U.S. via the Federal Reserve.
    Meanwhile, there were strong rumors in New York that the
Fed also bought a modest amount of dollars around 148.50 yen
today. Talk also circulated that the Bank of England purchased
a small amount of dollars for yen.
    The Fed's last confirmed intervention was on January 28
when it bought 50 mln dlrs in coordination with the Bank of
Japan. But on March 11 the Fed also was rumored to have
signalled displeasure with a dollar surge above 1.87 marks.
    The authorities' actions appeared to back up the February
22 Paris pact between the U.S., Japan, West Germany, Britain,
France and Canada under which the nations agreed to cooperate
to foster exchange rate stability around prevailing levels.
    But foreign exchange dealers were not overly impressed by
the authorities' intervention which they said can only soften
extreme moves in the market.
    For one thing, some dealers believed that the Fed's
purchases were done on behalf of the Bank of Japan rather than
for the U.S. central bank's own account, suggesting a rather  
watered-down American commitment to the currency accord.
    The Bank of England's action also was thought to be
completed on behalf of the Japanese central bank, reinforcing
the market's view that Japan is the most resolute of the six
nations in its support of the currency pact.
    "No-one doubts the Bank of Japan is serious. But the other
two central banks seem to be making more token gestures than
anything else," said Chris Bourdain of BankAmerica Corp.
    "I'm not convinced the intervention was concerted," said
Earl Johnson of Harris Trust and Savings Bank in Chicago. 
"It's a yen problem more than anything else."
    Some dealers said a rising wave of trade protectionist
sentiment in the U.S. limits the extent to which the American
authorities can endorse a stronger dollar against the yen.
    "The dollar's break below the key 150 yen level ties the
Treasury's hands behind its back. The U.S. cannot intervene on
its own account because of the strength of protectionism here,"
said Albert Soria of Swiss Bank Corp.
    Such comments reflect the view that the currency markets
are becoming increasingly politicized. Despite official
denials, some traders still feel the U.S. would countenance a
lower dollar to help trim the nation's trade deficit.
    The majority of the 170 billion dlr merchandise trade
deficit in 1986 was with Japan.
    Indeed U.S. Treasury secretary James Baker's comment on
Sunday that the February currency pact had not established
dollar targets was read by the market as a signal to sell the
U.S. currency and kicked off the latest retreat.
    "The dollar still has more room on the downside against the
yen based on the frictions in trade and financial services. The
currency market is becoming very political," said Natsuo Okada
of Sumitomo Bank Ltd.
    Okada expects the dollar to trade between 148 and 150 yen
this week but sees the chance of a drop to 140 yen by the end
of April or early May.
    Even if West Germany and Japan succeed in stimulating their
economies, it may not be enough to solve structural economic
imbalances in the near future, dealers said.
    "Even if Japan and West Germany do expand this year, it
won't be enough to help the trade situation much," said
Bourdain of BankAmerica, who also expects the dollar to drop to
148 yen in the next couple of days.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=9061>
Federal Reserve Board Vice Chairman
Manuel Johnson said the dollar has stabilized against other
currencies after action taken by the Fed.
    "We have taken the appropriate action and the dollar has
stabilized," Johnson said after testifying to a House Banking
subcommittee.
    He did not elaborate on the nature of the action nor when
it was taken, but said that it was in the spirit of the
agreement reached by six industrial nations in Paris recently.
    Johnson said the dollar's decline against other currencies
such as the Japanese yen has been gradual.
    Since the accord by the United States, Britain, West
Germany, Japan, France and Canada, foreign exchange markets
have been closely watching for indications of intervention by
central banks to determine the committment by those nations to
their agreement.
    The nations agreed that currency exchange rates were at
about the correct levels when the pact was signed earlier this
year.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=9079>
Federal Reserve Board Chairman Paul
Volcker said that the dollar's slide in currency markets has
been enough, a Fed spokesman said.
    The spokesman confirmed that Volcker, who spoke to a group
of financial analysts, said in answer to a question about the
dollar's recent slide that "enough is enough."
    Volcker has often expressed concern about the dollar
falling too rapidly in currency markets.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=9120>
The Bank of Japan bought a modest amount
of dollars this morning, possibly around 200 to 300 mln,
dealers said.
    One dealer said the central bank bought about 200 mln dlrs
through brokers and the rest through banks. The buying began
when the dollar was at about 149.60 yen, and helped drive the
U.S. Currency up to around 150, he said.
    Another said the central bank seemed to be trying to push
the dollar up above 150 yen. But heavy selling at around that
level quickly pushed the dollar back down towards 149 yen,
dealers said.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=9129>
The Bank of Japan is continuing to
intervene in the Tokyo market, buying small amounts of dollars
to hold the unit above 149 yen, brokers said.
    They said the Bank is coming in when the dollar is around
149.05/10 yen, the same levels as New York's close yesterday
and the midday close in Tokyo today.
    Dealers said the Bank of Japan is intervening in the market
through both banks and brokers this afternoon.
    The central bank is checking selling orders through banks
and placing matching buy orders, they said.
    The central bank started to intervene shortly after the
market opened here in the afternoon, the dealers said.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=9166>
The Ministry of International Trade and
Industry (MITI) has asked about 30 Japanese trading houses and
exporters to refrain from excessive dollar selling, trading
house officials said.
    The officials told Reuters MITI asked them to moderate
their foreign exchange trading because the excessive rise in
the yen will have unfavourable effects on the economy. It made
the request by telephone.
    A MITI official said the ministry has conducted a survey of
foreign exchange trading by trade houses and exporters. But he
said it was not aimed at moderating dollar selling.
    The trading house officials said MITI had asked them to
undertake foreign exchange transactions with due consideration
to the adverse effects excessive exchange rate movements would
have on the economy.
    The MITI official said MITI undertakes such surveys when
exchange rates fluctuate widely. A similiar survey was made
when the currency fell to the previous record low of 149.98 on
January 19. It hit a new record low of 148.20 yen yesterday.
    He said the survey showed currency transactions by trade
houses and exporters contributed little to the dollar fall.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=9213>
The yen could rise to 140 yen to the
dollar, a leading Japanese businessman said.
    Bumpei Otsuki, president of the influential Japan
Federation of Employers' Associations, (Nikkeiren), told
reporters: "The yen might rise as far as 140 (to the dollar).
The U.S. Economy is not good, and as long as the U.S. Economy
is not good, the U.S. Will put various pressures (on Japan)."
    "The yen's level depends on the condition of the U.S.
Economy rather than Japan's economy, and as long as the
American situation is bad, the yen will continue to rise," he
said.
    To cope with the negative impact of the strong yen,
Japanese enterprises must strive to cut costs by all means,
including holding down wages as much as possible, Otsuki said.
    He rejected recent calls from some government quarters for
wage increases this year as a means of raising private
consumption and thus boosting domestic demand.
    "We have to keep wages as low as possible," he said.
    He also said the yen's large and rapid rise is depressing
the outlook for the Japanese economy, noting that in addition
to hurting exporters it is also damaging domestic market
manufacturers through cheap imports.
    Parts of the service sector are also threatened, Otsuki
said.
    Tertiary industries provide services to manufacturers and a
downturn in manufacturing profits will adversely affect service
industries, he said.
    It is also doubtful whether the tertiary sector can fully
employ those put out of work in the manufacturing sector, he
said.
    Profits of service sector companies are likely to fall in
the business year ending in March 1988, leading to a possible
recession in the Japanese economy, he said.
    Otsuki said economic growth is unlikely to pick up beyond
levels experienced in 1986.
    The government's Economic Planning Agency said last week
the economy grew at 2.5 pct in 1986, the worst performance
since 1974 when the economy shrank 1.4 pct due to the first oil
price crisis.
    In order to stimulate domestic demand and boost the
economy, tax reforms aimed at bringing down the cost of land
and reforming the nation's housing stock are needed, along with
steps to bring down the high cost of commodities, he said.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=9214>
The Bank of Japan bought a modest amount
of dollars this morning, possibly around 200 to 300 mln,
dealers said.
    One dealer said the central bank bought about 200 mln dlrs
through brokers and the rest through banks. The buying began
when the dollar was at about 149.60 yen, and helped drive the
U.S. Currency up to around 150, he said.
    Another said the central bank seemed to be trying to push
the dollar up above 150 yen. But heavy selling at around that
level quickly pushed the dollar back down towards 149 yen,
dealers said.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=9222>
The Ministry of International Trade and
Industry (MITI) has asked about 30 Japanese trading houses and
exporters to refrain from excessive dollar selling, trading
house officials said.
    The officials told Reuters MITI asked them to moderate
their foreign exchange trading because the excessive rise in
the yen will have unfavourable effects on the economy. It made
the request by telephone.
    A MITI official said the ministry has conducted a survey of
foreign exchange trading by trade houses and exporters. But he
said it was not aimed at moderating dollar selling.
    The trading house officials said MITI had asked them to
undertake foreign exchange transactions with due consideration
to the adverse effects excessive exchange rate movements would
have on the economy.
    The MITI official said MITI undertakes such surveys when
exchange rates fluctuate widely. A similiar survey was made
when the currency fell to the previous record low of 149.98 on
January 19. It hit a new record low of 148.20 yen yesterday.
    He said the survey showed currency transactions by trade
houses and exporters contributed little to the dollar fall.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=9224>
The Bank of Japan intervened to stem
strong yen rises against the dollar during London trading this
morning, dealers said.
    The Bank of Japan here declined comment.
    The Bank of England was also rumored to be buying dollars
against the yen this morning but it also declined comment.
    Dealers said the intervention halted a sudden late morning
drop to a low of 148.65 yen, holding the dollar steady until
midsession at about 148.80.
    The Bank of England was strongly rumored to have intervened
on behalf of the dollar against the yen yesterday, but it gave
no confirmation.
    Overnight reports from Tokyo said that the Bank of Japan
was aggressively supporting the dollar, but failed to push it
back to the perceived target level of 150 yen.
    Selling during the London trading morning was largely
attributed to Japanese institutions.
    Dealers here were loath to quantify the scale of Bank of
Japan action this morning. One U.S. Bank trader said it could
have been up to 500 mln dlrs, but said this was largely a
guess.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=9295>
The Bundesbank bought large amounts
of dollars for yen in an apparent attempt to hold the dollar
above 149 yen, dealers said.
    The dollar intervention was in concert with some other
central banks, they said.
    Dealers said the Bank of Japan and Bank of England
supported the dollar against the yen earlier today and that
these two banks and the U.S. Federal Reserve were also active
yesterday.
    The Bundesbank declined to comment on the dealers' remarks.
    Dealers said the intervention underlined the determination
of central banks to keep currencies within recent ranges
following last month's agreement in Paris by six leading
countries to foster currency stability.
    One dealer said he had been repeatedly in contact with the
Bundesbank during the morning to see if it wanted to buy
dollars after the Japanese and U.K. Central bank moves.
    He said the Bundesbank told him it was observing the
situation to see if it should intervene in consultation with
other central banks.
    Since the Paris agreement on February 22 the dollar had
until yesterday traded in a 1.8150-1.8700 mark range, and above
150 yen, with traders reluctant to push the dollar down to test
central banks' resolve to defend currency stability.
    But the test came this week with the dollar falling below
1.81 marks and 150 yen. Dealers said a reviving trade dispute
between Washington and Tokyo and growing sentiment that the
dollar would have to fall further to narrow the obstinate U.S.
Trade deficit were behind the weakness.
    This week's intervention showed central banks were prepared
to cooperate to defend the Paris pact, dealers said.
    Dealers said it was significant the West German and British
central banks were supporting the dollar against the yen.
    That showed the pact involved multilateral cooperation by
central banks to foster currency stability, they said.
    But it was unclear how such cooperation was being arranged
and how frequent consultations between central banks were.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=9783>
The Bank of Japan was thought to have
bought a small amount of dollars at around 149.30/40 yen,
dealers said.
    The dollar fluctuated marginally after the small-scale
intervention, believed to total several tens of mlns of dlrs,
they said. Large-scale buying by foreign banks or by a life
insurance company earlier pushed the dollar upwards, they said.
    Trading was not very active and dealers were watching for
further central bank intervention to smooth out any sharp
movements, but underlying dollar sentiment is still bearish.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=9871>
The Bank of France intervened on the
market to buy dollars and sell yen to support the U.S.
Currency, dealers said.
    A major French bank said it acted for the central bank in
buying between five and 15 mln dlrs against yen.
    A dealer at another bank said his bank had been asked to
publicise the intervention, to send a clear signal to the
markets that central banks were acting in concert to maintain
the exchange rates agreed to be appropriate at last month's
meeting of the Group of Five and Canada in Paris.
    The dollar was being quoted at 6.0950/70 francs in early
afternoon dealings after a fix of 6.09425 francs.
    The major French bank said it sold yen at a rate of 149.28
against the dollar.
    The U.S. Currency was subsequently being quoted at
149.25/35.
    The Bank of Japan was reported in the market overnight to
bolster the credibility of the Paris accord following several
days of pressure against the dollar.
    Pressure developed after U.S. Treasury Secretary James
Baker repeated earlier statements that the Reagan
administration had no targets for the dollar, apparently
undermining the assumption that the agreement in Paris had
fixed broad fluctuation ranges for major currencies.
    Baker later said his remark had been misinterpreted.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=9946>
The Bank of France intervened to buy
small amounts of dollars and sell yen in Paris today to
stabilise the exchange rates agreed at last month's meeting of
Finance Ministers of the Group of Five and Canada, foreign
exchange dealers said.
    But they said recent central bank intervention in the
foreign exchange markets appeared to be a limited reaction to
temporary pressures rather than a major defence operation.
    A Bank of France spokesman declined all comment but sources
close to the central bank said it had also intervened
yesterday.
    Dealers said the earlier intervention was in concert with
the Bundesbank and Bank of Japan.
    The sources said the French central bank could have been in
the market again today in two-way operations, not necessarily
on its own account, but to counter short-term pressures arising
from the end of the Japanese financial year on March 31.
    One major French bank said it bought between five and 15
mln dlrs for the central bank and sold yen at 149.28 to the
dollar.
    Another bank said it had been asked by the Bank of France
to say it was in the market, a departure from the central
bank's usual insistence on confidentiality.
    But other banks said they had seen no sign of intervention,
which they said appeared to be on a very limited scale.
    "Even if 10 banks were buying five to 15 mln dlrs, you would
still be talking of a small overall amount," said one dealer.
    Recent intervention by the Bank of Japan appeared mainly to
have been required to meet year-end window dressing demand for
yen. "This is a specific short term phenomenon rather than a
wider trend," the dealer said.
    Operators have been extremely cautious about testing the
dollar's trading ranges against the West German mark and
Japanese yen.
    These ranges were set in February's stabilisation agreement
reached here by U.S. Treasury Secretary James Baker and the
Finance Ministers of Japan, Germany, France, Britain and
Canada.
    But speculative pressures started to build again this week
after Baker was quoted on British television at the weekend as
repeating earlier statements that Washington had no target for
the dollar.
    Baker yesterday moved to defuse speculation he was talking
the dollar down, telling a Cable News Network interviewer and a
Senate committee he stood by the Paris agreement. Foreign
exchange markets had been misreading his comments, he said.
 REUTER
</BODY>
